Gimme that Christian side hug!
Even if it's about golf, Tiger owes us no explanation.  Golf isn't in the Bill of Rights either, I'm pretty sure.
Give me a minute, I have to go think on this one...
Different strokes for different folks.
So, your's is just jpeg image
No it wasn't.
I'm confused too, why would they be playing Halo in class?
It's not a 'bullshit' culture argument; it's from having studied the religion and history enough to not make brash and sweeping assertions about something complex. But again, this is a common behavior among the mindlessly anti-religious (especially the Richard-Dawkins-type circlejerk crowd): religion has to be clearly and irreducibly binary. And that's simply not true.     And 'a look at [my] history.' I presume you mean Reddit commenting. I've commented on a dozen or so religious articles? Not to mention ones about my field of study, fitness, books (extensively), and collegiate education. I'm *clearly* a fucking Opus Dei member. 
Well...  actually I was just trying to be helpful.  
OK, here's what I think you should do to learn and how I made my own little blogging platform/CMS. Develop using Google App Engine and their Webapp framework using Python. With App Engine you get **free** hosting as long as your site doesn't get too big and you don't really have to  Start out either with this: http://code.google.com/appengine/docs/python/gettingstarted/  or this if you like books and want a little more concise and easier complete beginners guide for HTML, CSS and Python: http://oreilly.com/catalog/9780596801601  No matter which one you choose you will **have to** play around with stuff to learn and have fun.  http://www.w3schools.com/ is a great HTML and CSS resource if you need some help with HTML and CSS. http://www.python.org is where you go for Python specific help.  If you choose this route and have any problems just ask me. I'm by no means a pro but I know some stuff now.
Why would he be looking for it?!
Amazing service from UPS, it seems. :/
Fuck living wherever you do. "I wasn't the driver" is a completely valid defence in Australia. When they send you the fine/notice there is a section to fill in with the details of whoever was driving if you weren't.
Gilad Atzmon explores the roots of the phenomenon of Jews spitting on Christians and their symbols. He argues that, given the corrupting influence of the occupation, it is only a matter of time before Israel’s Jews turn against each other and the Jews-only state implodes.
With the H1N1 flu epidemic at its estimated highest at the moment here in Denmark and with 6 out of 7 deaths being chronically ill danes, are you taking any precautions to avoid getting infected?
There comes a point where everybody will say "no". Killing children and innocents should be that line.
I was playing goalie in soccer, and this kid was on a breakaway.  I raced him to the ball just outside the 18 yd box, and beat him to it.  I kicked it as hard as I could, RIGHT INTO HIS FACE (not on purpose).  The ball then rebounded off his face over me and landed in the goal on the fly.  The kid was in a heap on the ground with a bloody nose, but he scored, kinda.
No, it doesn't work.  Last year in Toronto there were huge Sri Lankian protests that blocked major intersections and highways for days.  All it did was piss everybody the fuck off.  Making average Joe sit in traffic for hours isn't going to accomplish anything.
Such an overlooked show. As someone doesn't care at football, I pleasantly surprised that it was barely in the show, and focused more on the characters.
Uh...that is a full proper address? Stick a USA on the end of it and you should be good to go. PO Boxes are just mailboxes at the post office that you pay for.
I already left him. I'd prefer for real change like Dennis.
Her name was Zelda.
85%
This happens a lot less often in places like Canada and the UK, where they have tighter controls on gun ownership.
&gt; These cannot be seen as natural arm positions to anyone.  Are any posed positions in Victorian photography natural? Many are affected "artistic" poses mean to elicit association with painted portraits and classical art. Also, if posing dead body, why not simply correct the position if it's unnatural?   And I don't really see anything unnatural about the pose. Her left arm is bent at the elbow behind her father, and her wrist is loose. It's only weird if you think her arm unnatuarally short.
One time back when I was about 16, my g/f at the time was 15 we went to the store to buy condoms. I get to the register and the black lady at the counter says loudly " No yous not having sex! " and went only to explain how we "was" too young for sex.   Embarrassing 
Yeah, but I counted him already as the sacrifice. I figured the Cabinet member was the evil rich guy, since he was the primary human antagonist.
Bring a gun and a knife to any fight!
should fly cheap.
My new watch fixer.
Actually, giving in to a bit of peer pressure tends to result in children being better adjusted.  They are more likely to conform to social norms, and more likely to lead productive lives.  Think for yourself, but make sure to think about how your thoughts affect others.  That second bit is good though.
Are they looking for Dark Energy?
I had my dad play some Halo on the PC back in the day. His take:  "Haha. That guy called me a 'nub'. What the fuck is a nub? What a tool."
You think Oprah and Tyra and the media wouldn't make a big hooplah about Tiger Woods being a DV victim?!  What on Earth could possibly be better for ratings and viewership than the boyish superhero of golf being beaten up by his Swedish bikini model wife?!  It would be like OJ and Nicole Brown-Simpson in reverse!  Oh no, sir.  If Tiger Woods is a male victim of domestic violence, he need only come forward with the details and the media wouldn't be able to get enough of it.  As for Rhianna, were it not for the leaked photographs of her with her face pounded in-- and phone calls corroborated by police and Rhianna's assistant-- she would not have gotten the widespread support that she did.
Sorry, I have a problem. :)
I remember I had just got my first bow ever and my dad was showing me how to shoot it. I got a bulls-eye the first time and ask my dad if it was possible to robin hood an aluminum arrow. He said they always damage the other arrow but deflected to the side. My second shot I was shaky as hell but someone got a perfect split 3/4 down the arrow before the arrow stopped stuck inside the other arrow. We were using broad heads too which may have helped split the other arrow.
Now you're child doesn't even have to read!
Upon first introduction after looking him up and down, "You're kinda cute."
I'm 50 but the caps and ex points are unintentionally funny. Easy, dryeraser, easy. What headline would you have posted during the OJ/Bronco tour?
I used to do a lot(more) pushups - but found that I wasn't compensaing enough with my back muscles, and as a result my pec muscles were pulling everything forward (doesn't help that I'm on the computer a lot) giving me terrible posture.  I cannot stress the importance of exercising your back while doing pushups and stretching properly enough...
Is the point here that you should be able to have the content for free? Or that there should be a viable commercial means of content delivery that gets the content to you as soon as it's aired? If that's the case, why is this something you should be able to have?
I guess, but without an agreement in place the agreement doesn't exist.  Besides this may be her way of telling him she isn't over him... You know flaunting her shit.
&gt;I agree, we are a long way off but, innovations tend to have a way to feed on each other.  Yes, I just think they're wasting a lot of their resources on "reinventing the wheel" by placing the (arbitrary/fictitious) constraint of having a *single* machine purportedly make all of the parts.  I mean I do understand that one aspect of the constraint is to "eat your own dog-food" scenario to force them to make decent enough (quality-wise) parts as a primary goal.
I've never been pregnant and my hair stylist suggested that I try them to help make my hair healthier/longer. After about 6 weeks my hair was growing about an inch a month instead of a 1/2 inch. Didn't make my facial hair grow (ha!) but hey everyone's different! 
I did that a few days ago. Maybe I should do it again, we had tacos over the weekend.
This settles it, next year I'm going to a Walmart dressed as a Spartan.
I KNOW!!! FFFFUUUUUUUU
Which food subreddit is the best one for this kind of thing?
Are there lots of kidnappers there like the rest of South America? Have you ever participated in an ayahausca ceremony?
4 downvotes?  Do you think people downvoted it because the title maybe?
Yeah, simple inexpensive ear plugs will reduce noise levels better than anything else you can use.
For me the scottish , especially the glasweigan accent is the strangest.
Marty! I can't attach the cable because there is a tree in the way, hope you like the fifties.
so Mad Max **was** a documentary. I always had a sneaking suspicion.
talking to real people.
That's *fantastic.*
3-4 times/week, and I always get compliments for smelling good so I figure I'm doing something right.
AIM will work. My uname is: h0ly lag or my MSN is: h0lylag@gmail.com  When you IM me just remind me your the guy from reddit.
?  Ok, I'll turn in one of the stripes on my geek rank for this, but "Kirk-in-the-cell"?
I wouldn't say the American accent sounded "very similar" to au/nz/za.  I see it as being on the same 'spectrum', but I can tell them apart very easily.  Well, to be precise, I agree with MalrackMalbama, (us) / (za) / (au/nz) I can tell apart easily, the latter two I sometimes struggle to distinguish.  Actually you could probably make that (us/ca) if you wanted to bring your northern neighbours into it.
Yea, that hummer looks so fake it's not even funny.   http://traintagspotter.deviantart.com/art/HDR-Red-Daylily-3-57790837  Mine looks so much better, using only one photomatix pass.
Here goes my karma, but if Tiger's wife just found out he cheated on her, and he got his face cut from, say, a ring on the hand that slapped his face, then maybe he got what he deserved.  My mother was a victim of my father's abuse, so I don't have a flippant attitude or anything, but if this was the result of a faithful partner of many years lashing out when she was hit with news of infidelity, I say let it go, it's really NOT the same as ongoing physical abuse.
and some chloroform for the grand finale
Am I the only one that really hates watching Terrans on this map? It's horribly imbalanced in their favor. 
A bag of rice, a bag of beans/lentils, assorted veggies, tuna, bread, and ground beef can make for some interesting and tasty meals with the right spices. Cheap as all fuck and it'll last a while too. I'm sure you already knew this though, just pointing it out to the others.
worst ffffuuu ever. 
The hell? This card is loaded with young, up and coming talent. And it's free. Don't know what your problem is.
Well, I can definitely see why it is interesting. Not sure what is out of the ordinary though.
I fail to see the point in mentioning weed.  I smoke weed pretty much daily and thoughts like this do not go through my mind.  Weed shouldn't of altered your state of mind enough to make you not realize you would be causing terrible harm to your body.  If you're so concerned go to a doctors office/hospital. Lesson learned:  Don't do drugs
I'll observe!
And the Indian gave thanks.  For the white bitch was gone, but he could craft a beautiful hairpiece from her scalp.
You realize, during the Renaissance, the church wanted to NOT translate the bible so that normal people were dependent on the church, right? ( Source  if asked for)
I concur. I might also add that she has one very lucky pillow. 
What the f is this ctrl-k thingie you mentionin' here?
It's like Barrens chat.  I'm not normally retarded, but whenever I'm commenting on Youtube I am!
Yeah, for sure. Plastic bags and bottles are ridiculous. We should just ban them straight up. 
Adults are people too.
If true, theft of IP is still considered criminal.
THIS!  Boxer briefs rock, but I also love love love it when a guy is wearing nothing under his pants and you can see that sexy "man line" down his front. 
1134 is hell upside down, 1135 is sell upside down and 304 is hoe. 
Looking back at Seinfeld, there a moments that still stand as sheer brilliance. Other moments sucked horribly. The thing about Seinfeld is, it ended. Anyone talking about it, they talk about the good scenes and the good quotes. The cream rises to the top.  The thing about Seinfeld is: it ended. Its not being made any more. Seinfeld lived and died and there is nothing anyone can do about that.  Penny Arcade is still being made. It may have been bold, innovative and creative in its prime, I can't attest to that. But what I see above and what I've seen posted over the last year to reddit is a comic that is neither clever, insightful or funny in any way.  Honestly... *Honestly*, if any other webcomic today included the line "he asked me to pull a holiday barbie out of my ass" as a punchline - would you care? Or is the status of the above comic, even though the writing in it is pretty weak, did it get 40 upvotes because people *actually liked it* or because its new and its on penny-arcade.com?
* I guess I'd study climate change - still doesn't explain why that would make me an "alarmist" only out to make money * The newspaperman does that about everything, and I'm quite sure Fox News makes plenty of money arguing against climate change.   * Last time I looked the number of politicians who support real change to combat global warming is fairly small (in the U.S.)  I guess my point is that it is an industry that we are talking about, so of course there is money to be made in it.  Sh*t, if someone works hard to potentially save the world (and, at worst, make it a little cleaner) I am totally cool with them getting rich off of it.  Because there are people destroying ecosystems for limited sources of a finite energy source right now and they are making huge profits.  I would rather see that go to something a little more sustainable and diverse.
Well that's cool, I guess.   So what do you do with your time? 
Apparently you haven't noticed the intrusion of Sharia law into many European countries.
too bad elisp code runs synchronously.
Windows is always asking me to use Sticky Keys... Now I see what it's really asking....
i want that shooting inside me 
I don't want all your $$....just some of it this month.  Then some more next month, and so on.  Basically I want to milk you.
Either way it's called being a hypocrite. It's fine as long as ENTER PARTY NAME HERE does it. Obama does torture it's cool, etc.
Why are my only options crappy corporate chains?
In Colorado it's explicitly against the law for an HOA to ban solar panels on your property.
Yuck.  &gt;For gigantic Mario fans, fear not, you won’t be disappointed with your purchase. It’s everyone else that should be wary before purchasing New Super Mario Bros. Wii.  So, what about people who like sidescrollers or platforming?  Care to guess how many of us there are?  &gt;how long do you honestly think a few new suits will keep you occupied?  I don't know.  Do you play Mario games to occupy yourself with new suits?  Yeah.  I brought mario so I could use the propeller hat.  Not to play the GAME, but just to sit there and use the hat.  Yep.  &gt;the Wii is a graphical powerhouse compared to its handheld little brother and any visual polygons on characters as simple as Mario and Luigi are unacceptable.   It's a Mario game.  It looks great.  It moves better.  Why the fuck does it matter if there are "visual polygons"?  &gt;An honest-to-god straightforward 2-dimensional sidescrolling platformer would have been a better way to approach the game.  Do agree, but this is subjective, and doesn't negatively impact what IS there.  &gt; Most people who purchase New Super Mario Bros. Wii are going to be doing so out of curiosity for the unique multiplayer option that has been added into the game.  Or because it's a fucking 2 mario game and it has been YEARS since the last one?  No.  I just wanna fuck around with the multiplayer.  &gt;There doesn’t seem to be a proper balance between multi-player friendly and single-player friendly levels. More often than not, gamers will become more frustrated with the other players than they will at the challenges placed before them.   1.)  It has amazing balance;  it feels like two separate games and both are fantastic. 2.) Frustrated?  How old are you again? 3.) Ever press 'A'?  &gt;The involuntarily slow decent that follows  Glances at controller... There seems to be a down button.  Wonder what it does!!!!  It's a bit subjective, but you seem to have some fucked up tastes and mental processes.
Did your ex happen to have her college-age sister over the weekend this happened and your relationship was 4-5yrs old?
hmm...
I may not aggree with all of them but I might at least try to follow them. It won't hurt, I hope.
No, I'd want Costello to run the party solo. None of these other Lib political sicophants.
I'm slightly aroused.
&gt;Makes Him Paranoid  And the lesson for today children, to be taken from Glenn's reasoning, is that NOTHING outside of you makes you 'feel' anything.  Only you reacting to something outside makes you feel something.  It is your reaction, your emotions and your mind that makes you feel.  And children, nobody wants to be subject to the whims of the arbitrary world; see, a Libertarian like Beck should be against admitting that something outside of himself made him do something, what with all the personal responsibility screed he and all the Libertarians seem bent upon.  
I remember the day that the Utopia boot disc was released for Sega Dreamcast (meaning you could download games and play them on a standard Dreamcast) me and my brother went to EB.  We bought a Dreamcast and at the checkout the guy asked us if we wanted to buy any games with it. We just said no, but we'll take a 10 pack of blank CDs.
The one dude looks like he just did some blow.
Remicade worked great for my son in law, he had a couple of surgeries for fistulas and had to have his ileal valve removed.. gut surgery sucks, there are always complications, and yeah he is skinny as hell. 
Movie: Children of Men Album: Tool - 10,000 Days
I have always thought Derrick Comedy was pretty funny. Their [24 spoof](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-Bc0mG5omTo) might be my favorite.
That's a thought provoking question. A couple differences, just based on what I've seen: - I think people who are driven exist everywhere, and many of the successful entrepreneurs I've met in developing markets would also be successful in the US.  - Culturally, there is a difference. There are many political and economic barriers for entrepreneurs in Asia that don't exist in the same way in the US. Although entrepreneurs are certainly well respected they're working under a system that doesn't value the laissez-faire approach like ours traditionally does.  - I'd say the general "dream" is the same, but in developing markets some entrepreneurs really want to give back and to see conditions in their home country improve. It's more collectivist in that way.
What would happen to the southern hemisphere?
Good point - "choice" doesn't necessarily mean non-genetic.  I'm more wondering if it's due to past experiences (and by that I mean all experiences, not necessarily traumatizing ones) vs. genetics.
I figure I'd throw [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Skyscraper_Index) out there for those who have never seen it.
I do now. Thanks buddy!
A cheap tablet that wasn't going to be cheap and was never produced is not a great idea, nor did he come up with it.
Only 3? You need to have your mouse hovering over the mute anytime you go to youtube. 
programs to download  winrar  quickpar 2 most files are separated by winrar, so that'll put them back together.  The parity files will ensure you can get the whole file even if one of the rar files is missing.  Quickpar 2 will run the parirty (par) files. usenet is divided into "threads" which start alt.binaries.&lt;whatever&gt; usually describing the files within.  Look for threads for what you want (movies, mp3s, audiobooks, ebooks, etc) and then browse the days of posts for what you are looking for. Easynews in peticular has a web based browsing system, where giganews does not (to my knowledge).  Google "easynews global search" for the quickest way to find files. good luck!
Is inescapable future of humanity!
"Emma Watson [has Kuato living in her vagina]!! No, wait...sorry my mistake."  /fixed
Gah. Add/Remove is still a far superior application. There's less clicking, better searching, and you can click all the software you want and _then_ install it all in one go. The software centre slows to a crawl as soon as you click the install button for me. I used to randomly browse Add/Remove every now and again, looking for interesting applications, but I don't even bother with the software centre. I just stick with Apt and if I'm in a really bad mood, I fire up Synaptic.  Edit: didn't realise it was still available in Karmic. Joy! I'm not keen on the chap's plans to replace it completely, though. 
4a9aef303eec12ce0807fb9f8edb1640e0236b41
What made you want to do an IAMA?
You were hooking up with other girls , you don't have a right to say shit about it asshole.  You think its ok to have sex with other girls, other than your girlfriend but get mad or jealous when she is fucking someone else?   Whatever, I hope she sticks you with the lease and leaves
What you're calling "subconscious" is precisely what Freud called "unconscious." This usage is pretty firmly established, at least in academic discussion.  While there is a distinction between "automatic" and "rational-but-not-aware" (hope that's an ok gloss on it), I don't think the distinction lines up with the two words in the way you claim. 
Both!
I came in here to say just that. Bonus points. We might be able to pay off our national debt if we legalize all drugs. 
She sounds like she is in a glass case of emotion.
Their primary responsibility is to stop counterfeiting.  Also, they're a part of the dept of homeland security and as such are not under the direct unilateral control of the president.
Care to provide a citation that other planets are warming at the same rate as the earth?  Can you explain to me how this graph represents a *net* increase in yield? The Global Combined Crop Yield scale ranges from 1400 to 3200 kg/ha... are you suggesting that this increase is entirely due to the increase in atmospheric CO2? The Fapper report states that "no small part of the yield improvement has come from increased atmospheric levels of CO2", but fails to specify the exact proportion. Are you claiming that, as shown in the graph, the part of the yield improvement that has come from increased atmospheric levels of CO2, even after associated losses are taken into account, is 100%?  Surely it's the case that the increase in Global Combined Crop Yields from roughly 1400 kg/ha in 1958 to 3200 kg/ha in 1996 is because of the advances in agricultural practices including increased mechanization, new hybrid crop varieties, large scale use of artificial fertilizers, computerized field management systems, and improved land management.   I would have assumed that CO2 levels had a relatively small effect on crop yields. I would also assume that the negative effects of heat on yields would cancel out or negate any positives from rising CO2. But if you can find anything that proves me wrong, let me know.
I can't say for certain whether or not it is genetic.  What I do know for certain is that when we study the genetics of model organisms we usually find that they have the same or similar genes as humans, just less complex.  Having said that, [it has been shown](http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC38490/) that just one gene can change the sexual preference of male fruit flies.  And given that there are [several hundred](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Homosexual_behavior_in_animals) animals whose homosexual behavior has been documented, I wouldn't be surprised at all the find out that homosexuality is heavily influenced by genes. 
&gt;Obviously not.  No, that's exactly what you did.  The oppression faced by blacks is at least somewhat comparable to that faced by atheists. Comparing saying something is "stupid" on the internet to "stealing" is not. Unless, of course, you think black people just like to steal. It's kind of funny, and offensive, that that was the example you went with.  "It's like a Hispanic thinking it's Okay to cross the border illegally!"
While I agree, bear in mind this is her account.  She may have been lying.
It's called E85 because it is 85% ethanol, dumbass.
I'm more creative about finding a place to take a poop.
First off, let me just say that if you need to get reacquainted with Macs, Apple has some great tutorial videos at http://www.apple.com/mac/.  Just scroll down to the "How to get more out of your Mac" section and play a couple videos, everything gets broken down really well.  There really aren't a whole lot of choices when it comes to Macs.  Are you looking for a laptop or desktop?
And I still wonder why I can't understand my *own* Perl code a week after I wrote it.
Can't wait for a TB iPod.  My 160gig is full.
Self posts aren't awarded karma.
Well now I just feel like a jerk :)
Trying to give this kid a lesson on anything is futile. He's passed through the education system and walked away with nothing.   This is either an amazing troll or someone who belongs on myspace.
I'm saying it was also Dan Brown's proof of Jesus tapping that Mary Magdalene ass.  People acted like it was somehow true because it was possible to interpret it as being in a painting.  
I am not.
What looks like a smile in the picture, turns out to be an uncomfortable facial expression when you turn it upside down: http://imgur.com/CFNpZ
 Freeholmes, I am sorry for the way you were treated at Perkins Restaurant and Bakery, Where Breakfast is Just the Beginning. Sincerely, sorrykevatronix  Now. Back to the chicken tender melt:  &gt;http://www.perkinsrestaurants.com/images/menu_categories/st14chk-tender-mlt-lg.jpg &gt;Crispy chicken tenderloins, bacon and Pepper Jack cheese with Ranch dressing on grilled sourdough bread.  Surprisingly, this is a rather unique dish. Most restaurants and bars don't offer it, even if they have all the makings (of course, they will make it off-menu for you). The pre-emptive inclusion of a whole pudding bowl full of ranch is genius. They don't mess around in the Midwest.
If you meant the country and not the country, why did you say *the country* and not *the country*?
Hello officer, these aren't the droids you are looking for.
Like leben?
It was my understanding that the number was a rule of thumb, and clearly varies from person to person, with 150 being a fairly consistent ceiling. Given that some people seem to be information mediators, and others reservoirs, it seems to me that is a logical conclusion of variance in "personal" Dunbar number - eg., I care about 8 people, but one of those 8 is a faciliator who cares about 150 (and is, in turn, cared about by ~100, with, today, a 50 on top being "celebrity" normalizers as above theorized). This also fits in with the semi-"natural" (read: recurring) breakdown we tend to have into "teams" or "squads" or "neighborhoods"  and then the hop ups to platoons/divisions/communities then companies/counties... not that, in our decentralized, informationalized society this are necessarily 1:1 equivalents anymore, or that "care" implies the positive sense we'd imply from, one hopes, the family usage; viz, I care about Jim in Payroll, otherwise my pay is late/we lose the account/I need my TPS report covers!
Your photographer is one lucky person.  I don't know how he manages to keep his hands off of you long enough to take pictures.
Can you provide a link to where I can do some reading on these "deep spots?"  I've never heard of this before. My girlfriend already squirts, but I'm certainly no kind of fingering master, so I would like it if I can improve my technique. 
I think her douchebaggery was in not being honest with you about it in the first place when you found her, but by breaking into her private social network you lowered yourself to that level and even farther below it. Besides, can you really blame her for lying to you after the way that you reacted when you did find out the truth? I think she should still have been honest, but if she has to live with you for another month and you're going to respond to the truth with a torrent of insults, I can understand why she tried to keep it from you.
As soon as I heard the news report I knew it was his wife overreacting to learning about an affair. Nigga definitely got a thing for Brunhilda's. 
Mulva?
I thought about running Mailman myself, the big trouble with Mailman is mostly setup related, it's quite a large hurdle to jump over to get one mailing list up and running relatively easily.
the space bar... two very distinct shiny impressions where my right thumb hits the bar...
Congrats on the fame among the insane! 
That's my plan! Did you see my proposal?
that is amazing. someday I hope I can have an anti me-club. for now, I have to settle for the one novelty account that pops up every now and then to creep me out.
I am currently trying to keep up with the Paleo diet.  Look it up if you are curious, but it is also a lean meets and lots of seeds, nuts, fruits, and vegetables diet.  With the exception of this past weekend, I have been pretty good about it, and over all i notice a bit of weight loss.  More importantly, i have noticed that that my sleep schedule and my energy levels has become much more regular.  
&gt;should mind their own business  So telling someone to go fuck themselves is somehow minding your own business?
it is available for cheap [HERE](http://d2key.com/) if you are interested. I haven't played it myself so I cannot vouch for it, but it is by Blizzard, and it does seem to still have a following, so how bad can it be?
whooosh~~~~~
VS6 runs like the wind.  I wish we could just stay on that version for all eternity.
I remember the day that the Utopia boot disc was released for Sega Dreamcast (meaning you could download games and play them on a standard Dreamcast) me and my brother went to EB.  We bought a Dreamcast and at the checkout the guy asked us if we wanted to buy any games with it. We just said no, but we'll take a 10 pack of blank CDs.
The fact that it took half an hour to open and was completely un-customisable didn't bother you? Or the constant crashing? Or the security holes?
Can't wait for a TB iPod.  My 160gig is full.
Learning pain management techniques is essential to preventing chronic pain from controlling your life
Sometimes I tuck it back when I'm talking about life.
The AHA came when he realized he would get more votes it he was pro-choice.  Dennis Kucinich " Aha! Great scott!! I will get more votes if I sacrifice principles I have held my entire life to appease the mob of progressives! Eureka!"
Then moisturizer, then an anti-aging eye balm followed by a final moisturizing protective lotion.
Charlie: Here's a confession: I'm in love with a man. What? I'm in love with a man... a man named God. Does that make me gay? Am I gay for God? You betcha.
I don't know if I should feel sorry for her lack of true friends, or amazed at her convinctions that her friends will remember her on her birthday, even to the point where thief seems more likely than forgetfulness.
Luckily the s is pronounced differently when it's a verb.
Trying to give this kid a lesson on anything is futile. He's passed through the education system and walked away with nothing.   This is either an amazing troll or someone who belongs on myspace.
I guess the same reason why some libertarians take ayn rand way to seriously.
Cynical much?
For NoXplode? I personally think No Xplode is completely unnecessary as long as you're taking l-argentine, which is cheap. Everyone has their opinions though, and you don't get the unnatural energy boost like No Xplode gives you. If you're young, you don't really need it at all. L-argentine isn't even nearly essential, either, really.  http://www.doctorvitaminstore.com/6165_Arginine.html
you can soak for 1/2 hour or so... but will take about 1/2 hour more to cook  and will have to play with amount of water a bit
Hulk smash?!
their coffee really isn't very good.  and i've been in starbucks all over the map.  i can't remember the last time i had a "barista", and i use the term loosely, who wasn't a gum-popping nasty little narcissist with more attitude than performance.   edit: i take that back.  i had an americano at a starbucks in a target store where i live just last week.  my barista was a very nice gay puerto rican.  he was charming and could really do some coffee cup magic.
Where are you located? Here in SoCal there are a few attorneys who are well known within the cycling community.  Best wishes to your fiance.
Or off of bridges :D
OBAMBI BANKRUPT THE CUNTRY AND MADE ME LOSE MA JERB!!
Anyone else think that this man had some money/property that a local government official wanted?  *edit* We've come so far.  In the 17th century, you just had to accuse someone of witchcraft to legally take all of their possessions.  Today you have to plant marijuana on their property.  Gotta love progress!
You were downmoded by those who have no idea how important this point is. 
Mmm... *beer googles*.
I thought it was only $500 per person. Either way, it is a paltry amount for what happened. The Indian Govt is mostly to blame for the lack of reparations to those effected.
For muffs, I like my [Bilsom Leightning L3s](http://www.amazon.com/Howard-Leight-L3-Leightning-Earmuff/dp/B0007X9QKK).  They're comfortable and they cut out noise well.  For earplugs, I got a pack of like 100 ear plugs from Home Depot for like $10.  They have good noise reduction (like 30 dB, the same as most ear muffs) as long as they fit right, but sometimes I have to try for a while to get them to fit.  So I prefer the ear muffs.
And you are like apparently from southern california. 
What's interesting is that most people are deluged into thinking that this is George Bush's recession (thus your headline is wrong in that part).  And that furthermore, Obama's stimulus package, which was supposed to create jobs, has failed in creating jobs.  His own estimates put the unemployment at topping at 8% without a stimulus; now it's over 10%.  Anyway, devaluing the dollar and increasing the deficit to levels for which we cannot pay off don't usually help the economy.
Oh I will. I'm holding you personally responsible :)
Looks like it is only available in the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland :o
I stalked you using Reddit's new search engine, featuring google.  http://twitpic.com/evcbe  Beautiful.
I have been looking for this website forever (saw the cartoon once and couldn't remember the name).  Thank you.
&gt;Obviously not.  No, that's exactly what you did.  The oppression faced by blacks is at least somewhat comparable to that faced by atheists. Comparing saying something is "stupid" on the internet to "stealing" is not. Unless, of course, you think black people just like to steal. It's kind of funny, and offensive, that that was the example you went with.  "It's like a Hispanic thinking it's Okay to cross the border illegally!"
&gt;the 4th wall breaking comic book character.  She-Hulk?
reddit is the new facebook
I think she is kind of cute... skirt and all...  I'm not much a fan of the bigotry and christfaggotry, but hey, we can't all be perfect.  I guess what I'm trying to say is, I'd still hit it.
Think of it this way: if you solved every mystery, you'd live in a world without mystery. That would be a horror.  Take a lesson from Zen meditation and seek to free yourself of the burden of your conscious mind from time to time. It's therapeutic.  As for God, it's a practically useless concept. The anxiety that Man feels on this subject serves only to make a market for religious frauds who peddle false salvation. Think of them as spiritual supply-side capitalists.  Some words to ponder:  “Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able?  Then he is not omnipotent.  Is he able, but not willing?  Then he is malevolent.  Is he both able and willing?  Then whence cometh evil?  Is he neither able nor willing?  Then why call him God?”  - Epicurus
Well I honestly know next to nothing about IRC, so if you'd like to work with akatookey on something or just run with your own idea, I'd say go for it.  Livestream is great because we can watch and chat in the same space, but it does have its problems. Great, but far from perfect. 
A ... brutal biology exam in grade 9? I don't understand how that's ever remotely possible.
What the fuck?
I could watch that on repeat all day.
Boxer-briefs look good on everyone. I like that style the best.
Nice. I hit about the same speed in my first car, a 1990 Toyota Corolla. I was pretty sure the car was going to fall apart at that speed.
well, that solves the problem if they directly link to it, but I mean in regards to a lot of people who save the image, then re-upload it to their web server.  When I slice it up, it deters lazy people from being able to do so without re-combining the images.   (also, I use amazon s3 and lighttpd, not sure if you can prevent hotlinking like that with s3)
Pull out.
I have my doubts to whether the light therapy is anymore than a placebo effect. http://www.lrc.rpi.edu/programs/nlpip/lightinganswers/fullspectrum/abstract.asp  Man made lighting don't have the ability to reproduce the same spectrum as sunlight.  But it seems to help lots of people so just don't spend a fortune on the lights.
Honestly my old Debian desktop cannot probably resume from suspend. However on recent laptops (Ubuntu) I never had issues with suspend/resume.
What?  Everyone knows -- now that they've not read a collection of out-of-context emails from a small group of scientists -- that Anthropogenic Climate Change is a fraud.  Therefore, all climate releated science is part of the conspiracy. No one wants to hear your sciency-lies 'round 'ere.
Yup. Rock Solid.  Don't post pics of this, though.
Though I haven't gotten married yet, the idea appeals to me because I'll always have someone there to support me.  Also all the social pressures, I suppose.
Impossible!  We have bigger plates!  America!
same same. 
There's a myriad of mods at http://www.damods.com that will make your gameplay more enjoyable.   Some are a little overpowering, whereas others are just important hotfixes (like the one that debugs daggers by making them not suck)
Am I the only one who would freak out at the flashing headlights as a warning? My mind would instantly jump to the urban legend (pyscho killer in the back seat about to chop your head off, car behind you flashing his lights to scare him, you unaware of your imminent demise), and I would probably rear end the car in front of me frantically searching for the ax murderer in my back seat.   But now I know flashing headlights may mean something else.
Ludicrous Speed
Me: "I dreamt about you last night."  Her: "Did you ?"  Me: "No, you wouldn't let me."
Sure everyone knows how [hard the Bush administration was on banking.](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2008/11/09/AR2008110902155.html)
At least you tried and tried. Most people wouldn't give good music even *that* chance. Much more respectable.
That would make you a policeman in kind ~getting off wnile arranging for tickets to people you couldn't see face to face. Do you beat off while watching TRU TV?
Inducing rage induction, you say? Protip: The red squiggly was wrong. =3=
Heresy!  You should all be on the reddit servers! Kidding, it's usually full, I don't blame you.
"I'd like to begin by saying fuck Lance Armstrong. Fuck him and his balls and his bicycles and his steroids and his yellow shirts and the dumb empty expression on his face. I'm tired of that asshole. And while you're at it, fuck Tiger Woods too!"  -- George Carlin
No I specialize in pediatric implants. I know the On-Q people and some others. That was a tough sale in the beginning due to reimbursement issues. 
It seems as if you are not considering that forcing people to vote on the same issue two times is illegal in Venezuela.... there should not have been another referendum in the first place....forcing the country to vote again on the same thing was definitely the act of a dictator.... you can be sure we wont get a third referendum to abolish term-limits.. now that its passed theres no going back..Chavez will be a candidate in 2012. If he wins he will stay in power until at least 2018.... so from 1998 to 2018... seriously...
Move along, move along
The Chicago Bears have hit a new low and in my humbled opinion, they need a total overhaul before the start of next season.
They seem pretty blissed out to me.
Well whats your option akatookey? If its decent, I don't see why we can't use it.
Most people don't know this but it's appropriate to ask for compensation above medical, property, and lost wages.  Insurance companies are more than willing to put a number to pain and suffering.
the DSM uses the terms dependence and addiction interchangeably. Care to give me a link or something? Because right now it sounds like you're just talking out of your ass.
&gt; We will be funded solely by our subscribers  That's why.  Consumer Reports is highly respected and are able to use this model, but ask any magazine or newspaper publisher:  the money comes from ads, period.  Especially now when newspapers and magazines are dying out.
Why's this guy getting downvoted? Isn't this basically the fundamental axiom of positive psychology? 
Actually, Ideas: A History of Thought and Invention, from Fire to Freud - Peter Watson, is not restricted to just the west. It talks about how China and India were organized, how their thoughts flowed into the cannon of the west, and why the east didn't take off while the west did. Sure, there's a lot more to say, but I don't think they were ignored. Given that they don't have such a profound impact in our lives, like say the experimental method or the organization of governments (even the eastern ones today), I think they got a fair amount of space.  There are a lot of interesting books on eastern philosophy and life (and lets not forget native american, african, etc; which I happen to find more interesting), but for 10 books that are supposed to let you understand the world you live in, I think it's a good balance.  What books on eastern philosophy would you include?
If that heroic researcher hadn't bothered to check the vaccine first, there would have been lots of dead people instead of a few ferrets.   Why was the "vaccine" even prepared anyway? Just by accident?
People are *born* gay/straight. End. Of. Story.
somebody make that flash game!
Is anything currently being done to change/improve US business immigration law?  What effect has the economic downturn had? Less applications coming in? Harder to prove that there are no skilled US workers that could fill the job?  What would happen to a H-1B worker if he were to be laid off? My understanding is that he has 10 days to either leave the country or find a new employer to sponsor him.
&gt;I'd take a racist republican if he or she does their job.  Even if their job were to disenfranchise the minorities?
That's doable!   Except first we need to do some number crunching around the relative cost of making people pay for ongoing flunked tests and issuing tickets and collecting fines.
**Dude sounds like you both need to grow up a bit.**  Agreed. I'm pretty disappointed in myself about the facebook thing, but the temptation to know for sure was just too great.
I'll set the beavers to work immediately, sir!
Tell us more about your polka phase.
OMG you have jelly doughnuts? OMGOMGOMG
Then how come so many Americans are violent?
Fuck the beauty contests, JUST BATTLE
Those men did not die in vein.  This lead to the creation of the 160th Special Operations Aviation Regiment (Night Stalkers) which has greatly changed spec-0ps and how they are used / transported.   
I have never seen this show, but from various youtube videos posted of it, the black woman seems to have a total range of about two facial expressions -- pouty fascination, and open-mouthed awe.  Seriously, watch a few of them, it's uncanny.
I came in here to say just that. We might be able to pay off our national debt if we legalize all drugs. 
I like this one the best so far.
I suppose there's no accounting for differing tastes.
Yeah, the other funny fat guy.  They all look the same right?
Their paycheques are written by the taxpayers, not by the President.  They don't have a Chewbaca-like life-debt to the president, and if someone told them to arrest the president I'm sure they would do it.
Well, it's always possible these people just comment without using the "reply" feature. But again, there are times when even my own videos that do have nested comments, for whatever reason, get listed chronologically.
Ah, you get your ideas from comics, that explains it.
The biggest dose we got was next to the reactor on the patch they call the Dead Forest.  This is where the lumps of graphite from the reactor core landed after the explosion.  The radiation levels reached 4 microsieverts per hour which isn't as much as you'd expect.  You get about 20 microsieverts from a hospital X-Ray.  What counts is the amount of time you are subjected to the radiation.  At these levels you are OK as long as you don't hang around.
I find that in the US, if you throw rocks at people and participate in riots, it seems more like a police state than it does if you don't do those things.
An appeal to emotion is not an argument.   For what it's worth, I've seen it too, which is why I take the very specific precautions I outlined in my original post to minimise the risk to others. Whilst I am aware that the risk cannot be eliminated, I do not feel that my actions in the scenarios outlined represent a significant increase in my danger to others. A car doing 70mph will kill you just as badly as a car doing the 75-80 I'm likely to be doing. The impact forces and reaction times involved are already far beyond human tolerances. I'm not talking about doing 150 in a 70 zone here.   On any road with fewer than two lanes per-direction, or a stated speed-limit, I don't speed, because I feel that in that scenario, I am posing an unreasonably increased risk.   -----  &gt;How many have died from piracy?  Almost certainly none. Lives have been ruined, but not ended. To paraphrase, my point was:  &gt;It is very simple. Piracy is illegal. Breaking the law tends to be punishable.
I thought he was sitting on the arm rest.
Wow, I thought I invented that.
I can't say for certain whether or not it is genetic.  What I do know for certain is that when we study the genetics of model organisms we usually find that they have the same or similar genes as humans, just less complex.  Having said that, [it has been shown](http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC38490/) that just one gene can change the sexual preference of male fruit flies.  And given that there are [several hundred](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Homosexual_behavior_in_animals) animals whose homosexual behavior has been documented, I wouldn't be surprised at all the find out that homosexuality is heavily influenced by genes. 
Fuck yeah. All hail the Sexy Man Line :D  Also, I love when girls wear skinny jeans but have a cute perky bum :P
But you cant advertise that sort of thing. I secretly wish that someone was dumb enough to break in when I am at home.
There is no "right" to unionize.  The ability of a work force to unionize is directly conditional on the non-fungibility of that work force with cheaper untrained labor.  To wit, if your job could be done by a monkey, and there are plenty of monkeys out there looking for jobs, you're SOL.
Well that's fine. I thought it was probably something like that anyway. I'm not sure if I would trust myself to drive while intoxicated in any way. If you've ever been so stoned that you just daze off into your own half-conscious world, you'll know what I'm talking about. I can imagine certain states of mind I've experienced while high that would make it very difficult to drive. If trying to advocate responsible and safe use of marijuana is being a douche, then yes I suppose that's me. Way to over-react though.
That was the best burn I've read here in ahwile. 
I was always upset that my cousin - a girl - was 2 months older than me. When you're 3 or 4 years old, this matters a *lot*. Mom told me not to worry, and that boys just mature later than girls. I realize now we were having separate conversations - she thought I was upset she was taller, but I went on to believe that girls age faster early on, but that I'd catch up and be older eventually. I spent a lot of time after that lost in thought, pondering how that works. Did time warp somehow? Would I speed up suddenly to be older? I think I settled on just believing that there's a normal time for things like growth, and girls grew faster early, and I'd grow faster later, and that somehow people's ages were determined by how fast bones and muscles and skin grow, so I would be 'considered' older later. I just want to be the one who was 2 months older. I was compartmentalizing. I think I had tons of compartments as a kid to help me make sense of all that I screwed up in my head.
standard imo
Yup, which is why I didn't say translate, I only said copy.
Ah, the truth. Always hides behind a joke.
snowey
All workers need a union.
This would be better naked.... and with bacon.
Oh oh, you forgot the part where it takes forever for your game to get approved even if it's a critical bug fix.
leave me alone mr.  I have already told you Im underage and I WILL NOT MEET YOU FOR SEX.
You're over simplifying the situation.  I'm well aware that many black people owned black slaves [even happens now] but that's totally irrelevant to my point.  If you lived ... in America ... in the 60s ... [you following me?] you were NOT A SLAVE, YOU WERE JUST TREATED LIKE SHIT BECAUSE YOU WERE A BLACK PERSON.  Are you following?  ... Christ almighty heaven on earth are you really this stupid?  /irony
Day Man (Aah-aah-aah)  Fighter of the Night Man (Aah-aah-aah)  Champion of the sun (Aah-aah-aah)  You're a master of karate  And friendship for everyone 
That's a nice man you have there.
Is that why execs want employees to wear ties?  So all they need to do is exchange the faces every now and then?
To me she looks like she *is* 10. I think I'm in the minority but it's a bit too pervy for me to ogle her or the Olsen twins. 
I don't have alot of people I can openly talk about this job with.  I just started, it's my first time dancing, and besides a few close friends, I keep this a secret from classmates and everyone else in my life.  I thought it might be nice to have another community to talk to about this (I've been on reddit for over 2 years, and this is a throwaway account).
I can't imagine much more pathetic than wasting your time to put up a site to whine about something you don't have to use.
On the other hand, if it were your kitten...
Not without doing a conspicuous adjustment you don't. 
Fair enough.
Go on, pro ball player. 
In my car or in a car? Because the difference is about a 100 mph
It is if you don't get sick.
It's pretty hard for a 10 year old to give birth, but that is not for lack of trying. http://www.answering-islam.org/Silas/childbrides.htm   &gt;There is no God but Allah, and Mohammad is his messenger.  So what happens if you don't go along? Theo van Gogh's death is a perfect example of tolerance as practiced by Mohammedans. Even if a majority do not act on this, the literature supports it, so if the local Imam calls for it - he can get action.  It is HIS religion. Mohammed made it up, and he owns it, the "Whole Message." This belief system is the source of much death, slavery, poverty, and destruction around the globe. All the supposed work in the "golden age" was stolen from the Library of Alexandria. The architecture, again stolen from other sources. The "Belief system" stolen again. The result, not good. Sorry if you think it's a good thing. I just don't see it.  Peace be with you.
haha, not a troll. 100% serious!
I guess you haven't heard the "good news".
Point?   Reddit?  Oh.
whatever happened to that wake up sheeple guy?  he was cool...
This is what my father told me.  "Two bulls are looking down at a field full of cows.  One says to the other, 'lets **run** down there and fuck that one by the fence.'  The other says, 'nah, lets leisurely **walk** down there and and fuck every single one of them'"
There are at least two projects aimed at bringing webkit to KDE - rekonq and arora. Rekonq just hit 0.3 and is very stable, usable and fast. It aims to be a KDE browser and currently lacks kwallet integration and adblocking. I understand in the long run, they have vague plans about making it multi-threaded like Chromium.  Arora is at 0.10 and is comparatively much further ahead. But, it aims to be a standalone browser (no plans of integrating it into any OS or DE).  So, if it's webkit you want, you have two really good alternatives today. If it's the multithreaded bit you want, I'm afraid, it's going to take a while longer...  (If you use arch, both are in extra. pacman -S rekonq or pacman -S arora. Good luck!)
that there is an all-powerful God who exists outside of time, yet who somehow gives the slightest shit about how the narrative of Earth unfolds, and really really hopes it all goes the way he wants it to. fucking stupidest shit i have ever heard.
Attention whore.
You know how when you are driving you are pretty much constantly moving the steering wheel slightly from left to right to keep the car centered?  When I was around 4, I noticed this and I also noticed that when my dad would back out of the driveway he kept the steering wheel very steady.  This caused me to believe that you had to shake the wheel to tell the car to go forward and keep it steady to go in reverse.
So milky and wonderful.
Question (This might be due to my misunderstanding of the problem)  From the linked page: "Exactly one of the following sets is in OBS4: 22x11, 22x10, 21x10. " If 22x11 is 4-colorable, doesn't that indicate that 22x10 is colorable?  Couldn't you take the 22x11 solution, and hack off the rightmost or leftmost column?  You wouldn't be adding any rectangles which required evaluation, just taking away any that went into the removed column.  And then, by extension, if 22x10 was 4-colorable, 21x10 would be 4-colorable (by removing a row instead of a column).  If by some mathematical proof only one of those was colorable-  it would *have* to be 21x10, wouldn't it?  Since 22x11 -&gt; 22x10 -&gt; 21x10  I'm asking not so much out of nitpicking, but because I feel like I'm missing something significant as to the definition of "4-colorable", which so far I understand to mean, given the grid, it is possible to color all cells in the grid with 1 of 4 colors such that no rectangle laid over the grid (and obviously aligned with cell edges along x/y axis) has corner cells which are all the same color.
I don't think it matters which parent has the talk, as long as one does it. In my case, my mother was in denial that I could be having sex, and my father was the one who had a serious discussion with me about going on the pill. He impregnated a girl at 17, so knew the consequences well. My mother couldn't talk about sex at all.   Sure, it's a bit embarrassing for a 16 year old girl having a sex talk with her Dad, but it needed to happen, and I am very glad it did. I'm now a Mom and am so proud that my father cared enough to put aside awkwardness for my best interest. I plan on doing the same with my son.
How do you make a list like this that doesn't include Kevin Smith?
I stopped caring about upvotes and downvotes a long time ago.
I have a better idea. Get us out of the freaking wasteful, profit driven wars and send me a check for MY part of the profits made from unbid contracts.  
Moore may be interpreted as a "shit disturber," but, in a way... that's actually a good thing.  And I think "shit" is a good word to use. Why not disturb the shit? It is after all, the leftover excrement of digested food that, if allowed to fester, will become a great growth media for all sorts of nasty things. Why not flush the shit?   I am not trying to incite you, simply saying that this is a shit situation, whether or not you explicitly agree with Moore is a different issue.  Someone who has paid close attention to the media trends and political factions in the United States over the past ten of fifteen years would recognize that what Moore does has not had a negative affect on America. The same cannot be said of other polemicists like Sarah Palin, Laura Inghraham, Bill O'Riely, Glen Beck, Michael Savage, and Rush Limbaugh, who have consistently been caught purporting half-truths and outright lies, whilst creating fear and paranoia in Americans who have not found better sources of news and information.   In essence, what Moore says in the letter is true, whether you like it or not. Having a sense of the nation's geist is as much an art as a science.
See. Just more evidence that the erectile dysfunction drug manufacturers are waging a subliminal and covert marketing campaign by implanting images such as these in our social networking sites. And they said *I* was crazy.
The so-called Law enforcement/Prison/Treatment complex has grown exponentially with no end in sight, and no meaningful reduction in illegal drug supply or use.  Yet spending money on interdiction, prison, probation and treatment continues to be the non-answer it's always been.
why?
The main policy difference is in Public Relations. Labour tells us what it thinks we want to hear. The Tories wait to find out if it was what we wanted to hear, and if it wasn't they say the opposite.  Seriously though I suspect under the surface there are substantive differences but it's not how public politics works these days to talk about policy. The media's not interested because it doesn't attract readers. There are differences in schools policy, the Conservatives have taken a lot of the people who were giving Labour their ideas and are taking their further ideas while Labour's rather lost its way there.
&gt;The Ottoman Empire isn't Western. Ottoman Empire was considered part of Europe, and depending on the century, was more or less a puppet of European powers. Also, it didn't occupy the whole of the Middle East.  Never said we should drop Israel, so no need to argue there. 
It was funny more than a year ago when it hit the net. Now it's just a bit tepid.
I did this last year at work but I ripped off the skull from zelda and posted a b&amp;w printout on all my IT equipment I didn't want the "associates" touching.  
I just gained a bit of respect for EA
I just tried it and it gave me the message that steam offline mode is unavailable because no login info was stored. I think you did it differently.  Try this. Launch steam. Go to files&gt;change user. It'll log you out of steam. Don't log back in and cancel when it tells you to input password and such. Turn off wireless and launch steam again.
get seven swans by sufjan stevens. it will make you like indie folk!
A lot of trees seem to have helper boundaries for hunters. For instance, a tree right off the corner of the Tank Burger in Heavy Rain seems to help you land on its highest point if you jump off the Tank Burger at it at a 45+ degree angle. My hunter stopped right above said point and fell down right onto the highest clipping point on the tree, ready for a 10-12 damage pounce.
True. So which one is going to kill us first and worst? We should be addressing both simultaneously, which is done by moving to a green (cradle-to-cradle) economy. 
&gt;We are still adapting to the new reality we live in where there can be too much salt/fat/calories. Religion has been around a lot longer.  We're also adapting to the new reality of a world with relative political freedom, self-determination and free world-wide exchange of ideas that makes religion maladaptive. Now there can be too much fat, and too much god. It's a new era.
No, downvoted. I enjoy their $5 tall(?) cups of coffee, and their stupid-ass wording for stuff that confuses non-frequent coffee drinkers such as myself. But Starbucks employees want to unionize? Starting to look like some locations hired a bunch of commies.   Screw this, I am going to McDonalds.
They can't all be amazing.  Just grab some clean looking business template, throw their logo up in the corner, cash the check and move on to the next one.  In the fortune telling biz this is called a "cold reading".  You're not feeling it, so you just reach for some fallback material and roll with it.
Thanks dick. I hope you realize you are responsible for my inability to gain an erection for the rest of life. 
sweetpaulaspods.com
We have always been at war with Eurasia.
Sounds like you have a drill instructor ;)
But you can poke them with not-particularly-pointy sticks.
Baby Spice had much more going on
I feel bad for the guy driving the truck. Im from Illinois and was sent out there to do some storm drain work in the bay area driving a vacuum truck almost as long as that. I got lost one time and ended up almost in the same predicament. I couldnt for the life of me find a place big enough to turn it around and the further i went the steeper it became. It was terrifying and luckily i found a parking lot JUST big enough that i could get my big ass turned around and get the FUCK out of there.
I searched for "camo lizard," and got your post about your post about searching for camo lizards.
Thanks, I always make that mistake because my brother's name is spelled how I spelled it in the title.  
I appreciate your response and clarity:) Unfortunately I do not speak Danish - is an English translation of the new legislation available?  Thanks!
Is someone gonna check on iHi and preg?  Fine, I'll check on th
That was damn nice.  Did you survive?
Twin studies suggest it is partly genetic, partly environmental. Like almost every trait. Does it matter?
Good grief.  I know I'm getting old when I forget what year it is.  This story and my following comment is all because, for a brief moment, I thought it was 2010. I don't know what to say.  I'm laughing and shaking my head.  *sigh*
Because you realy think that humans are the ones in charge of the LHC?   *Raise eyebrow*
While finding places to stash the dough.
Sorry to laugh at your dismay, but this made my day!
Pencil, paper, pub.
There must be at least 88 keys to this.
Field of Dreams
A banana is roughly 90-120 calories. That's over 3000 calories.
upvoted for hella
I believe most libertarians believe sound money in general is a better idea because the dollar is backed by it. I'm neutral on the issue myself. But I can tell you that the federal reserve needs a huge overhaul and transparency. Also read this for a different opinion:http://www.lewrockwell.com/murphy/murphy152.html
I TOTALLY DID NOT KNOW YOU COULD PRESS F TO GET AWAY. FUCK!  edit: and consequently made my skifree experience miserable as a child.
Exactly. Ants have more limited resources than humans. But like Native Huts which are made with raw materials found locally, were made by forces not found under nature's control, because nature itself does not provide us with natural shelter. Even though it would be very nice. Which lead to land possession, houses, capitalism and mortgage. All of which "Artificial." 
As a prolific reader, and someone who read all of the twilight series in a single sitting, I would warn you against judging the entire series by the first book. The second book is the worst and the last book is the best. I would actually say that the last book is the one worth reading, and that the others are prequels which establish the character's back stories and relationships. 
nothing like intelligent discourse to prove a retarded non-point.  Well done sir.
I get really frustrated about this because it seems kind of irresponsible to report something like this. The average person is probably so confused about the weather and the environment and aren't willing to change this because they don't have any reason too. I think thAt irregardless of the apparently fudged numbers we should all still think about how fucked up our environment still is,  and strive to lessen our footprint. No one is going to care about the environment if petty articles like this keep coming up.
*snicker*
"He said, just as he would warn someone if a car were about to hit them, he is warning homosexuals of their sins." Since when is being gay like an out of control car WTF!
Open "Software Center" and remove the package software-center or whatever it is called. If this doesnt work, try synaptic. Or simply  apt-get purge software-center
No he's taller because he is sitting on the arm rest.
Your bra fitting experience sounds a lot like mine. It is a pain that boobs tend to change size at times of the month (maybe not everyone's). One of my friends refuses to get measured because she says there's no point, for that reason (though I think it's mainly that she likes being able to get a bunch of cheap B and C cups in high street stores and is scared that might not be her actual size). But it is worth having a few varying sizes, if only bigger cup bras weren't so expensive.   It doesn't help that brands vary too (as with clothing, shoes, everything damnit!), or even different bras in the same brand, you're right. Oddly enough at least one of the ones they tried on me in the shop whilst fitting was Freya and did up just fine in my new size, but I guess style of bra has something to do with it too - they kept trying to put me in full coverage ones (not sure of brand) where the wire came up too high, dug into the middle of my chest and hurt, but the cups felt baggy. Hey ho.   I suppose the bra makers can't take into account the huge individual differences between people's boobs (the shape, the gap between them, etc). It's a shame we can't all have personal tailors ... everyone would be dressed so flatteringly! A bespoke bra (or several) would be great.   I'd never heard that about the band sizes being made slightly bigger for that reason though. That does seem to be the sort of thing 'Linda' was getting at, though she didn't really explain why. Is that a vanity-sizing thing do you think? Except sizing ribs up and cups down? That sort of thing bemuses me because I thought the 'great ideal' was to be narrow with sizeable boobs, not the other way round!  
what the hell is up with the censoring?  my heavens, you simply can't show titties on the internet.  it simply isn't done.  moronic.  (and yes, i know they're uncovered right next to them.  i'm questioning what effect the black band has at all)
Oh.... that would explain.... a good deal.
I have both. But I usually look at the countdown more often than the count up.
super seite mit spassgarantie
It wouldn't, it would make him or her less likely to do so.  Questioning the rational basis for a law is constitution-speak for one of the ways that laws can be invalidated.
Hispanic person here...there aren't enough "WTFs and facepalms" in the world to help me get over that. Oh, and the billboards with George looking all bug-eyed and stoopid? Jesus.
Not to sound heinous, but where do you think you'll be when your parents pass away? It's not possible that you'll be able to continue supporting yourself once this occurs and without any true experience on your own, supporting yourself, what do you think will happen?
I didn't like Captain Forever, it was too easy to get bits blown off your ship. All you needed was one hit to kill your laser and it was impossible to not kill everybody else's lasers, so after half a dozen shots you can't kill anything anymore. :(  It would have been better if it had made it so that once you blow up a ship you got a random selection of its pieces (including ones you have 'destroyed') so that it was possible to actually make your ship better.
Heh. That's part of why I grabbed an invite when I saw one available. Who knows, might end up being brilliant. But for now, strider24 seems on the mark.
You title is confusing. I get it, but your wording implies that you don't work and work at the same time.
way to sound just like a religious zealot.  You guys are pots calling kettles black.   Its a silly stupid and thoughtless attack.  
*an* hero
Madlib
I was reminded of this when I read an interview on Digital Arts with Brandon Schaefer. He took it upon himself to design a series of exceptional posters of well know films in a retro style. Apart from enjoying the work, this has led to a raising of his profile and offers of similar work from a French film company. 
last night, and almost daily.  We have 4 kids, but we still manage to copulate like teenagers - BECAUSE - you never know what the next day brings.  You could die tomorrow, have some enjoyment today. Yea, that sounds like bullshit, but it works for us.
That would be surprising!
Uh.. that means nothing without a valid address supplied. Firebug &amp; other such apps can change any webpage to say anything you damn well want with any pictures you want.
What sort of freedom are you talking about? Because depending on your definition of freedom, everybody is enslaved to some degree or other. So, the question isn't "are you free," the question is "are you free enough."   Personally, I think Starbucks baristas are free enough. 
sounds like you're a prick that needs to go back to "cali" and smoke your bud that's "up to your standards". some of us out here cant afford to smoke at all, and atleast you CAN get bud if the need arises. my advice? either settle, or get popular.
The scientists aren't telling people they can't do anything. They are promoting the facts. Politicians decide what to do with them.
teeh
upvote for Presidential Time-Tractor
we can't stop here, this is bat country.
I'm still waiting for your justification for calling Sabbat "hipster metal."
Cause they represent the character of most the males on here: a bunch of pussies :) 
I'm a Christian, and I in no way found this offensive. Learn to relax guy.
The pay in the NBDL is terrible. He probably does much better overseas.
Islamic Sharia law would enslave women, endorse rape, brainwash our children and oppress science to extremes that would make the fundie christians look like amateurs. And Sharia law is endorsed by a fucking huge majority of muslims. Fuck you, and fuck islam.
Yeah, knock up your girlfriend of 15 and enjoy life!
Sadly, I don't agree with you, unless you believe securing oil is "necessary".
Anyone have trouble getting sound to work on XP?  Edit: Actually, the sound works, but the music does not.  :(  Thanks for this link!
In first year, I wasn't surrounded by Engineers.  I was surrounded by arts student.  And they forced me to play "Never have I ever".  It was a little horrifying.  
Yeah but its only a waste b/c you *didn't* find it.
Are we missing that he drew a crowd who ended up insulting the woman, cursing at her? That's the better one, the winner? I saw both lost in the end.   I'm a lesbian, btw. Don't insult me by saying I'm anti-GLBTQ+SA.
They pay for everything else? What do you mean?
A cucumber, petroleum jelly, and a magazine.  I didn't realize how creepy it was until after I got a funny look from the cashier.
I would have said lots of booze, bacon and narwhal blubber (it tones muscle). But that's just me.
I'm gonna rise up, I'm gonna kick a little ass, Gonna kick some ass in the USA, Gonna climb a mountain, Gonna sew a flag, Gonna fly on an Eagle, I'm gonna kick some butt, I'm gonna drive a big truck, I'm gonna rule this world, Gonna kick some ass, Gonna rise up, Kick a little ass, ROCK, FLAG AND EAGLE! 
ac21dd7350b438f80e9ffb9879d174b9d780cc9c
Cenosillicaphobia
you're doing it wrong.
Yep, Mathias Blad has been back for two albums now, and their new albums are more like the older ones.
Well, luckily all the friends met our breakup with a sigh of relief and a "dude, don't worry she was kind of a bitch anyway". 
My penis remains long... despite your italics. ;)
Let me know when you fail out of school / lose your job / lose your [valued relationship].
That is nice, birth is beautiful.
This chick is ridiculously hot imo. The devlish eyes just before she goes for the handstand maneuver that said "you though that shit was cool? check this out..."  yea, i melted.
Drugs. Alcohol.  These are the only ways to put your thoughts at ease. Note: I'm serious.
oh, you're right.  i should have looked at your username sooner; it would have told me all about you that i needed to know.  sorry to have taken your time.  :-)
What would happen if said university found out about said stripping?
Lesson: do not name your uncle "Jack" and you won't have to worry about commas.  An actual case... tariff law was supposed to read:  &gt;All foreign fruit, plants shall be subject to tariff... etc.  Forgetting the comma made the tariff only apply to fruit plants and cost the government a lot of money.  (Reference: The Book of Lists.  Not online, AFAIK.)  &gt;All foreign fruit plants shall be subject to tariff... etc.
I'm sort of the same way. I think it's that if I'm putting forth the effort to look, I wanna get what I'm looking for and I think I tend to judge others quickly. On the other hand, if a girl comes up to me and makes the effort, then I'm more likely to enjoy her company in spite of our fundamental differences.   (btw, do I know you from digg? were you rawrrrrr on there too? my old handle on there was Epitaph)   ((reddit &gt; digg))
Some guy got killed when he took a rock to the chest, near my house.  Horrible.  I always look at overpasses when driving on the freeway.
But it's so much better pooping when you know your getting paid to do it...
i also enjoy that after 10k, they want you to pay 10 bux in shipping as well.
&gt;they seem to think they have room in their hearts to truly care about every person in the world's personal problems.  I think you had a good point going then undid it with the last line. Not caring about a missing white female you never met or 100,00 starving children you never met both qualify as not 'care[ing] about every person in the world's personal problems', but one is usually a media driven attempt at ratings while the other has actual impact on human life on a *much* grander scale. I think it's unarguable that one issue is more important than the other. Just because you can't care about everything doesn't mean there aren't better causes to care about than others.
To be fair, most people have known their significant other longer than some people have known their spouses.  I'm looking at you, Las Vegas.
That was the *first* thing she said to you? Hmmm..
The ALF can go get fucked.
I don't know why you got down voted for your original question, I up voted just for the record, its a legitimate question imo.  I admit it does seem arbitrary but there was a purpose behind it.  The idea of taking one day per week and saying "Nobody is permitted to do any secular work on this day" was something very new at this time.  The reason why this rule was given is that the Israelites were commanded to rely upon their God, and trust that even though they sacrificed one day of secular work that they would not be in lack of the goods they needed to live because God would care for them so long as they kept his commandments, commandments which the nation had agreed to keep including they had agreed to accept the penalty's for breaking those commands.  Also there was another reason, the Sabbath day itself was to be used for worship and for reflection upon their relationships with each other and with their God.  It does seem off to us, but that is because we live in a secular society where as these events took place in an entirely different context of a theocratic society where religious observance was not just recommended but was actually enforced by law.
The Indian Govt took over the site, and Union Carbide gave them $470 million in reparations. Place the blame where it is due, the Indian Gov't, for there lack of teaching the people who worked there how to properly manage the place, for not cleaning up after the accident, and for not giving enough of the money to those effected.
pathetic human trapped within the third dimension tries to understand higher dimensions. lol. that's like trying to describe a hypercube using only one dimension. you can't even define it. 
well, it's never fallen over/apart/down before, so i guess it must be okay. idiots, that's why it's called "the first time"
Don't knock it 'til you've tried it.  The Irish have a boiled sausage, bacon, and onion dish called coddle - everything looks raw, which takes some getting used to, but it's delicious.
That's what I thought at first, but then I realised, no.
Dude, she just told us her son was *having sex.*  'Nuff said.
this is good
Utter nonsense.
Your musical compatibility with ventolin is Very High  Music you have in common includes The Flashbulb, Fleetwood Mac, Al Di Meola, The Beatles and The Smashing Pumpkins.   How do you find a %
[Here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Laptop_theft#Laptop_tracking_software) is a wikipedia article listing some laptop tracking software. [Here](http://techpp.com/2009/04/05/4-free-tools-track-recover-stolen-laptop/) is a blog post about 4 free tools to track a stolen laptop. Netbooks are cheap enough that you shouldnt spend much on recovery. keep your reciepts and see if its covered on your homeowners or other insurance you already have. Most important is to protect any personal information on the netbook with full disk encryption (truecrypt). Thats more valuble than the cost of any netbook
The workers only have income because the employer is offering it to them. Take their profits, and noone will have any. Everybody's greedy in your scenario, especially the employees who want to strongarm their employer into bargaining for contracts that have already been negotiated.
I was REALLY stupid.  I took it to lunch and put 17 miles on it.  My boss was pissed but I told him it had 12 miles on it when it came in.  It was a "Millennium Yellow" convertible and had a six disc CD changer in the trunk that I couldn't get to work because I put the CD's in upside down.  It was fun but stupid.
Double Barrel Blues Band out of Syracuse New York signs with B.E.B.E., Inc, out of Tampa Bay, FL.
That is fucked up.  How can they charge you double and not give you the space?  It makes no sense at all.
Wow, two in one day?  How original.  Please go fuck yourself, I just moved here and nobody gave me inside information about what side of the city I should be on.  lol
He just pulled a Wil Wheaton
e59635cc74a3a14e97521ce81a9255d7be91fa99
I'm not even talking about while pooping, I mean the mental state you are in while holding a poop. I call it "poopbrain" and was hoping other people experience it
Yes. I had to port a Hypercard application to Metacard. The company was moving from the Mac platform to PCs. Hypercard was a pretty neat environment. However, no matter how seductive it seems at the start, [proprietary lock-in](http://diveintomark.org/archives/2006/06/02/when-the-bough-breaks) usually ends up biting your ass.
I read your name Shits and Witch.
Courtesy Diner has some of the worst service of anywhere I've ever been.
This seems obvious.  Have you conversed with God lately?  He's mean.
Sup dawg....
Yep, it often comes quite in handy to know random stuff like that, if only to start awkward conversations with strangers on public transit.
Maybe, but the spoiler is *who* dies, not how.
Most people don't break into homes while people are there.
at first i was 95% skeptical and anti-steam, because when it first came out, to me it was nothing more than a device to prevent the piracy of half-life 2, forcing customers to authenticate their copies of hl2 at launch.  but steam has evolved into a legitimate digital distribution platform. it has reinvigorated PC gaming for many people.  and who could forget the awesome, **awesome** sales??
Well, that was 5 hours ago, I think it's time someone should remind you about it.
Me too. It's terribly painful and embarrassing. 
Quite easy for you to say, seeing as how they are out there fighting right now.  Let's see you say it when they are not.
what would be the fun in that? ;)
I'd like to think this is the economic take on adultery = bad: raising the opportunity cost decreases the participators in the market; fewer adulterers means more (again, this only has to be a correlation, not a 1:1 correlation) stable households which means more functional (again, a correlation) children which means more functional adults which means a more functional society. I'm not passing judgment, I'm definitely not suggesting this is a perfect system, I believe this is an 80/20 for surviving population groups with our huge investment cost for offspring.
oh, puh-leeze.  do show me the last time congress actually approved a "conflict" we've been in.  
&gt;Do you imagine you're doing some kind of community service by scolding the subreddit like you're its damn mother?  Well, somebody needs to do it.
It's Tenacious D.
Upvoted for shitting out Sarah Palin. 
Billy and the Clone-o-saurus.
Landed or flying? My brother can catch a landed fly every time. He says they always fly the same way when they see your hand coming.
But if your in a criminals rights state then they will break in to steal your guns, guns are as good as cash on the streets. If you cant legally shoot them they just take their chances with the cops without worry of being shot.
upvoted because you don't deserve THAT many downvotes. damn.
So, that crazy looking site really *is* related to the server that serves a huge amount of pages?
The Chinese already own America...letting in some more illegals at this point in time is meaningless.
ask the Imbecile.  s/he seems to be well-versed in such things.
I can't believe I have been using Steam all these years... with dozens of games across two accounts... and I have never used this feature.  Awesome.
"Here I sat, broken-hearted.  Paid a dime and only farted." I wrote that while waiting to poop.  "Bob Osborn is gay".  I wrote that after I pooped.  You tell me.
UVA isn't exactly Notre Dame.  59-53 isn't bad for schools that aren't exactly Notre Dame.
You can try this clone DVD program for free. It stand aside of other cloners since it can clone ANY discs, both DVD and CD, both normal and protected DVD. And it has very easy interface!
Trolls trolling trolls who are getting trolled by trolls.
In the Past Years, this Company has been Internationally Awarded more than 15 Times.
I remember reading a story about a man who had been depressed for years.  He wanted to go the romantic route and jump off the Golden Gate Bridge.  About 1/10 of a second after jumping he said "this is a horrible mistake."  He survived the impact.  I suspect a lot of people feel that way, but have started a process they cannot end.  You can try getting help again, try things differently, try getting new friends, try getting a new life, try living in a new place. But you cannot do this over again. If you die, you are gone.  You don't want to do it.  Your communication with us proves that.  If you are adamant, don't be so callous as to kill yourself in your loved ones home.  That is selfish and you know it.  
You mean hands down? :P
Everyone should read Singularity Sky and Iron Sunrise.  And also the Laundry series. 
It's scary because it tells me that person thinks they are *entitled* to half of the money simply by 'virtue' of marrying me, and that they would treat the money that is 'extra' to them as disposable income. It's not 'extra' money - it's money I worked my ass off to put into the joint account.
Sort of seems counter-intuitive for gay populations to be on the rise if it's genetic doesn't it?
epic whinney
The last one is the most important, but very few realize the healthy benefits of swallowing.
In a way it is. Fap has flourished among americans because there is no competing term ("masturbate", or "jerk/jack off" are not only unwieldy, but fulfill a slightly different function). But there's nothing they love in the uk more than a good "wank", and it's been hard for fapping to find as much of a following over there.
Lessons will take place at Schrute Farms.
He better bolt before the police arrive.
So long as you're not saying all people who are gay were touched as a child, I'm not sure why you're downvoted. Traumatic experiences change you in all sorts of ways and I don't see why sexuality or sexual orientation is different.
That's not a reflection of the relative dangers.  It's like saying "if that in-growing toenail goes septic, the lion gnawing on my other foot won't matter".
I just found it: Skitt's Law [Internet Laws](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/technology/news/6408927/Internet-rules-and-laws-the-top-10-from-Godwin-to-Poe.html)
Are these not made from womens stockings and acrylic wool and beedy eyes?
Maybe I'm naive, but wasn't a substantial cause of the economic mess we are in the (mainly) American consumer's continuing pathological need to keep buying lots of cheap useless shit, thereby (a) putting themselves into debt over their heads, (b) causing serious trade deficits with the Chinese (who indubitably made 90% of the stuff in that cart, we can argue about the baby), and (c) undermining US domestic production in the process?  You'd think the average fat Wal Mart shopper might have learned...
The third one down has to be one of my favorite ass pics of all time.
Really good point.  Though it seems their history is in stationary turbines.
"Obama told the crowd that when she and her husband left law school, the monthly payments on their school loan debt was more than their monthly mortgage payment. She said they only got out of that debt when Barack Obama wrote his two books, "The Audacity of Hope" and "Dreams from My Father."" http://www.foxnews.com/politics/elections/2008/04/09/michelle-obama-baracks-book-sales-paid-off-our-student-loans/  Well, it DOES seem to have worked out pretty well for them.  Maybe I should amend my statement to say "Anybody who takes out half a million for their education, and then does not either become president or write a best-selling book, or both, is a total fuckup."
While it is possible that you killed the mobo, it's unlikely. I've found that videocards die more easily. See if you can find some other videocard to try, it might be some kind of incompability.
I was wishing this very same thing!?!
My bad, I should have been more specific, I meant when probing. Its tough enough when you have 15 blues in local flying around and having them on your map made it easier to pinpoint the ship that wasn't in fleet. 
If those men had been armed, this never would have happened.
The difference is that shooting down flight 93 would have been understandable and not part of some conspiracy to terrorize the country.  It's a hard decision that Americans would grudgingly accept, and those who believe it was shot down *do* accept it as being necessary.  We elect leaders to make those kinds of difficult decisions.
Whoso pulleth out this sword of this ass and crack is likewise King of all Internet.
I suspect it will be more interesting now.
Because society also consists of these religious nuts, who are the only one who will find this kind of behaviour acceptable. Thus, if you do it in the name of science - everyone thinks you're a nut, including e.g. scientists. In the name of religion, only the scientists still think you're a nut - the others only believe you're the wrong kind of nut.
I just read through the 200+ comments.   Hope she can take a joke. If she can't, you have seriously screwed up.
They are. "Love thy neighbor as yourself." 
It cost $17 million directly, but how much did it save in other areas? The article mentions decreased hospitalizations, higher education rates. Im wondering if there was also less crime, and other factors that woulkd end up saving society money and making society a better place to live (which is what we want isnt it? )  Also it was an an *experiment* too see what the social effects would be, NOT as you claim, simply a government project. You dont end experiments half way thru. That would be pointless. 
wat
Also tall people in general are paid more and get better opportunities in life, like good looking people, so take the good with the bad!
She's adorable! =D
Throw a tea partay http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PTU2He2BIc0
&gt;what are rambling on about. I agreed with the op. Plus this entire thread is a shit show.  I think you accidentally a word.  &gt;&gt;People are going to downvote everything they dont like and upvote what they do so it will have no berring on what people want.  Totally agree.
first things first is that they [have](http://store.makerbot.com/toolheads/plastruder-kit-mk3.html) made a head you can put on anything, and do. the second thing is that it can now print primitive (and obviously expensive) circuit boards using the solder extruder. also as of now you can buy one for less then 1000$, show me any other protoyper that can claim that. it of coarse will only contiune to get cheaper, probably at the same rate as it's commercial counterparts, not to mention they almost all use either subtractive heads (wasteful) or a proprietary "ink".
I just got back from a trip to Malaysia, where every traffic light for both drivers &amp; pedestrians has a countdown timer next to it; big numbers clearly telling you how long you have to go. On top of that, the little animated walking man on pedestrian lights starts running when the timer gets under 7-8 seconds, from memory.
My girlfriend did not squirt, but she still liked it a lot more than the way I used to conduct myself down there.  Still very intense orgasms.  Thumbs up.
To be fair, when people propose "green" solutions like this: http://www.engadget.com/2007/04/30/proposals-would-turn-highways-into-wind-farms/  It really is hard to defend all "climate rationalists."  It would do the scientific climate community some good to divorce observation from policy propositions.
Well, Senator, you can't 'defend' yourself from someone who didn't attack you. Afghanistan never attacked us, we attacked them. Remember?
I think his major problem is the fact that society is judging FAT. They are not judging people.  When you see a morbidly obese child, do you think Prader-Willi or do you think bad parenting?  When you see an obese person in Walmart on a scooter, do you think thyroid or do you think lazy?  Our society thinks the latter unless we are proved otherwise. So you saying that "Oh, I'm not mad at you--I'm mad at those OTHER people", you are still, at a glance, judging everyone the same way which leads to those in elburto's situation to feel discriminated against and understandably enraged at ANYONE posing that sentiment. After awhile, it's just annoying to have individuals try to save face by pointing their finger at the "real" problem when someone confronts them on the fact that there are other factors at play.   Upon meeting someone, you don't know their story and you probably won't care and think whatever you will unless someone changes your mind.  EDIT: Grammar.
i love that idea, i was trying to get my kids involved locally in raising funds as part of school, or getting involved with an international effort to distribute them in the field.  I think it's brilliant.
Ah, a fellow "poopbrainer!" Nice to meet you.
Justified?! What in the hell? Let's inspire right-wingers to change their ways by being nice, drawing a crowd of support and THEN cursing them?
Quit being a pussy.  Bang the shit out of some chick and be obscenely loud.  I wouldn't break into anyone's facebook, but fuck it.  Who cares that you did.  You know shes a lying whore now.  Long story short, grow a pair.
**Jogging + audiobooks**. I think just about any routine exercise is going to be boring because, well, it's routine. Audiobooks/podcasts give your mind something to do.
Welcome to how 95% of people feel all the time.
That's probably a much better way to look at it.  The longer time goes on, the more I believe the South Park explanation, in that 9/11 was really done by a bunch of pissed off Muslims, but the investigation was botched so to confuse the public and make us think something was going on when in reality it wasn't.
I suppose you have the incontrovertible proof of that allegation?
You work with flying saucers? Cooooooool! You should do an AMA.
I promise to, uh, give you some of my karma if you hate it.   Or at *least* some orangered envelopes!
That is an asset worth keeping!!
In Soviet Russia, cold gets you =]
Agreed 100%   I find it sad when people care more about some faceless celeb, than their own neighbor. In Japan it is borders on manaia when a celeb does something news worthy. It really makes me wonder WTF!? 
And yet you can easily measure the amount of distance your fingers move and the number of adjacent or otherwise easier to type combinations on Dvorak vs Sholes layout and Dvorak comes out on top pretty easily.
Most Christians have the same kind of life as everybody else. They believe in an afterlife and eternal paradise to spend it in, but they're still focused on this life and acting within it. But in platonic terms, they're just as disordered as the average non-Christian. They can't be happy if they're focused on fulfilling base-level needs and desires and ignoring their intellects and spirits.
I stared at this for 10 minutes, wondering, "why is the smiling guy saying 'tandard Shipping'???"
Whaghgt?,? Youiu thiiknniik ytou'rere fdufnnnyty?,
Emma-Jerr  (Like jerk without the k)
Mr. Scolnick: You've really got the pedal to the metal, don't you, son?  Lewis Scolnick: Yeah, I do, Dad. I've got the cruise control locked in at 35.  Mr. Scolnick: Tell you what. Kick it up to 37. Let's live dangerously.  Lewis Scolnick: [shocked] Dad!
Spoiler alert maybe?
Don't worry you didn't miss out on much.  You missed out on weirdness and feeling inadequate. Enjoy having sex with someone who unconditionally loves you.  Thats the best.
Cats are awesome.   A picture tells a thousand words, so it's much easier to look at, upmod and move on.
It's just a damn package like 'kde-i18n-csb' (Kashubian language support for KDE). You don't **have to** install it.
I hope it's cool with you that I read that in Bobby Generic's mom's voice.
Wombat poop is cubic.
Thanks for the response.  What state was this in?
A 20 minute poop session?  That's a ridiculously long time.  That happens to me like once every two years.
i think in a way you've answered your own question - you'd like to travel but are contstrained by time - i'm assuming due to the fact that you're pursuing a PhD? Perhaps a little better time-management to allow yourself to enjoy some of life's simpler little pleasures like books, tv, videogames and i'm sure you could at least fit in a week's break to give your head a rest?
Having a close match between pronunciation and spelling is very important for learning a language because the two will reinforce each other: every time that you read the word you will be able to both see it and hear it, and every time that you hear the word you will be able to both hear it and see it.  &gt; As one mundane example of the advantages of a phonetic writing system, here is one kind of linguistic situation I encountered constantly while I was in France. (Again I use French as my canonical example of an "easy" foreign language.) I wake up one morning in Paris and turn on the radio. An ad comes on, and I hear the word "amortisseur" several times. "What's an amortisseur?" I think to myself, but as I am in a hurry to make an appointment, I forget to look the word up in my haste to leave the apartment. A few hours later I'm walking down the street, and I read, on a sign, the word "AMORTISSEUR" -- the word I heard earlier this morning. Beneath the word on the sign is a picture of a shock absorber. Aha! So "amortisseur" means "shock absorber". And voila! I've learned a new word, quickly and painlessly, all because the sound I construct when reading the word is the same as the sound in my head from the radio this morning -- one reinforces the other. Throughout the next week I see the word again several times, and each time I can reconstruct the sound by simply reading the word phonetically -- "a-mor-tis-seur". Before long I can retrieve the word easily, use it in conversation, or write it in a letter to a friend. And the process of learning a foreign language begins to seem less daunting.  from: http://pinyin.info/readings/texts/moser.html
143mph.. Just picked up a used corvette a couple months back and had to see what it could do wide open on the freeway in the middle of the night.
Sauron?
I had a look and it seems similar to this indie game called "From Primordial Egg".
You're not texting this post from my trunk are you? 
They are sins. These so-called followers of God just prefer to ignore those rules because it's much more convenient for them that way. It annoys the shit out of me as a Christian.
If you got it via torrent, yes. If you managed to download it directly (via rapidshare, megaupload, etc...), then maybe (logically it shouldn't be illegal, but I'm not a legal expert either).
For reasons I'm too lazy to articulate, I'd recommend taking up fishing, hunting and wilderness survival. Get out of your own head and hone your prowess as a predator.
Sadly it's Dark Athena.
Or to those of us who've consumed them for any length of time: (Meals Refusing to Exit or Meals Refused by Ethiopians).
Not retired, retarded, there's a difference...
Congratulations and best wishes! 
he got a little lazy on the last 2 (-+-, 0+), but he pretty much explained all of this in the article
Drastic change to end your Britney Spears decade?
and even if it was it wouldnt exist.
I guess I still don't get it.  I see the reasons for a denial of climate change, because there are big businesses involved in that denial.  But the other side doesn't make sense to me.  Why invent climate change?  Who benefits from that?  I mean, who benefits that also has the power to bribe almost every single respectable scientist in the world and to create such a mountain of fake data?
Yea I was looking at your feet
Good choice, I think...  If I were makin a quick purchase based on this thread and a little bit of research, I'd definitely end up with the same thing and who knows....a little in depth research might lead me the same direction.  What color did you get?  I like the red one a lot, but I don't think I could bring myself to buy it.  I usually hate bronzy gold stuff, but I kinda dig it actually....and the black is just plain sleek-stylin nice...  Silver is ...well...you know...pretty typical but always nice.
The proof is in the pudding!
Ok, I fibbed, I didn't make it through the review.  I just see so much bitching about how *bad* Twilight is and I kind of just read a few sentences about the writing and I commented and left.  Coming back, I commented in the wrong article.  This one just happened to be the one that I saw after the front page has been filled with articles putting down the content of the book/movie.  Edit: That being said, there are tons of books out there for young people with bad morals and ideals...I'm sure this one isn't going to make young kids emulate it any more than the others.
Perhaps I was unclear.  If the core function is to protect the Constitution, and by extension our rights, then my pointing out that over the last 5 decades we have been tasked with things that are not prescient to that mission is not a statement that those tasks are protecting our rights.  I was saying that we have been tasked with many jobs that have nothing to do with the rights of Americans.  I could point to the Cold War in general, but that would be a flimsy half-argument at best.
It's actually fairly simple to clap with one hand.   1. hold your arm out with your forearm pointing up.   2. Tilt your hand back towards you, as if you were holding a waiter's tray.  3. Keeping your palm stiff and your fingers loose, move your forearm forward and back.   4. Profit!
I think you're the one making an issue out of race with this. I tried to come up with a common example that many of us have heard before. And the fact is, many of us have heard of a black person justifying their actions because of what our ancestors did. I'm not trying to be degrading to black people at all.
I did 650 pages in word with table of contents, figures, cross references, dynamic indexing... Some of it took a while to figure out, but once I had the structured document metaphor in my head, it flowed smoothly. 
SWG is basically a WoW-clone these days, but it is a WoW-clone template inserted over a world that was never intended for that type of gameplay. As a result, it's very buggy and bland. And they just released new content based on the abomination that is Death Troopers. That cannot be forgiven.
That's no good news to update.
&gt;I can't believe we had to wait until your genius came along to realize the utter uselessness of the entire advertising industry.  My job is here is done.
~150mph 2003 Audi allroad, V6 twin turbo and chipped  and I'm a chick.
Mabey they can trade a few draft picks for Kyle Orton.
Of course.  That is their answer to EVERYTHING.  Tax, tax, tax, tax, tax.  Ugh.  Can't trust your government.
Mob mentality. I bet they all thought they were the biggest, most badass motherfuckers in the world.  It was 10 against 1.
Yes its normal
You mean you go beyond the regular upper decker?
That actually would have made a pretty good punchline if it had been the last image. I don't know how you'd show it visually though.
No.  But I am a nystagmus researcher.  I've been doing a little side study on albinism and infantile nystagmus syndrome (INS) on and off the past couple of years, looking at the feasibility of determining how much of the visual acuity loss is due to the underdevelopment of the retina, and how much is due to the INS.  http://www.abstractsonline.com/viewer/viewAbstractPrintFriendly.asp?CKey={594CEAB3-CFC0-412F-B8A2-7CEBDBA45C9E}&amp;SKey={631C7E55-9CC6-4FEE-B8CF-2618179B8C8B}&amp;MKey={7795A420-8CB1-433D-9873-743C5CBD087A}&amp;AKey={C7EBB51B-512B-49A6-B4F2-0ADB01DC195B}
Fuck all of you. He's an old guy who writes books for a living. Good ones take time.   The last book took five years, so will this one.  Get used to it and shut up.
awesome advice. thanks! am about to move over to windows 7 and ninite is gonna save me so much time.
c67e7b7d1618236fb79262183a51c54146d7db2a
A sex toy at a sex shop. The older guy behind the counter was so creepy, and couldn't say anything without some kind of double entendre. He kept trying to get me to also purchase time in a viewing booth. Even if I'd been interested, I was pretty sure that was where he was intending to murder and eat me. The worst thing was that I forgot my wallet there, so I had to turn around and go back. He handed it to me all coy, like I must have forgotten it on purpose so I could look into his creepy, child-molesting eyes again, and I spent at least a week certain he'd copied all of my personal information down, and also masturbated to my license photo.
that explains a few things, god probably just torrented this universe due to DRM.
Bomb America.
I like the [Peltor H10As](http://www.amazon.com/Peltor-H10A-Professional-Canceling-Earamuff/dp/B00009LI4K/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;s=hi&amp;qid=1259626313&amp;sr=8-1). Passive, but cheap and effective. If I'm shooting something loud I'll double up with cheap foam earplugs underneath, can't hear a thing then.  Edit: Just wanted to point out, these Peltors block out 29dB, whereas the active ones ruertar recommends only block out 20dB for 6x the price.
It could be. If there's "god" in the title, it's downvoted almost automatically. And this is part of my complaint... The title is the very same of the article.  The proportion of downvotes seems low now that it has gained 4 upvotes since I started calling the atheists attention to that post.
What is normal spoke language, then? Speeches? They're basically written language read out loud. Actual recorded and transcribed spoken language tends just to be pretty awful to parse, but that's just how spoken language is without the non-verbal element. I can't just say that the conversation you have between your friends is "terrible speech" and ignore it if I'm supposed to be studying spoken language.  It's easier to discard obvious mistakes in written language (and most corpus research is done on texts written by professional native writers anyway, AFAIK).  I have absolutely no experience with computer parsers so no comment on the latter half of your post. Sorry.
I just found this because of [the new reddit search thingie](http://www.searchreddit.com/)  I am very confused but this totally made my night, so thanks!
Mirc is great because we can chat whenever without having to stream things.  I don't even know if it's necessary, but chat seems useful just for setting up the subreddit.  I also kinda wanted to gauge how useful it would be for everyone.
That being said, there's benefit in a bit of patience as well. Especially if you're the only Special alive, and the other Special Infected are 10-15 sec away from spawning. It's best to wait for them, since L4D2 seems really balanced for Special Infected combo attacks (partially level design, partially who the Director chooses to spawn players as)
That's pretty cool, thanks.
Ok, Abolish the Federal government and then do what? 
Yeah check out my post. Says same thing kinda but I don't think you need an agreement to know the difference between right and wrong/rude and polite :)
it makes me sick to know that slavery still exists today
I wasn't hating on technique.
Don't be ridiculous.  I clearly said the country.
you guys need no reason to start yelling at islam and muslim. even then islam is fastest spreadin religion in the world. just because it is based on truth. Now I come to this video. I live in Pakistan we have 95% muslim population and 5% are christans and some other minorities. I live in a small city which has 7 churches. what the hell are you talking about you guys. in some cities where other religion exists their respective holy places are present.  Every year thousands of Sikh come to pakistan and offer their religious obligations. you westren people should see the fact with your own eyes not with biased media eyes.
They do it because you need to be on that flight.  I plan to fly rarely, if ever, and to personally never pay for a seat on a plane if there is any other way to get to my destination.
Yes, because the world is simple and there are "people from 4chan" and "people from reddit". No one visits both, and everyone that visits either has complete loyalty to their community. Everyone reddit is a cool intellectual nerd, everyone from 4chan is a moron.
I love the scowl, as if the cop was giving you the opportunity to feel like she got cited because of you.
If this girl's your best friend there's really no reason why you shouldn't be able to ask her or you guys talk it out... really not saying anything is most likely going cause more damage than anything else.  Whether you want things to go back to normal or want to pursue a FWB thing, or date or whatever you're gonna have to talk about it. Just tell her what's going on, you may be surprised at her response. 
Sigh. While freedom of speech should be a basic right, I don't know why us westerner place it in front of food, water , shelter and (sometimes) health care.
Pop Rocks-coated condoms to give her a warm tingling sensation.
Water outlet is nonplussed.
Man, I miss him.
When someone else is talking on the phone. I can't stand it when I don't know what the person on the other end is saying for some reason.
I agree with basically everything you said, however Nik Antropov is from Kazakhstan, and he's already played for Kazakhstan internationally which means he's ineligible to play for any other country.
Of course it would hurt the economy because it would reveal all the shady shit you've been doing for decades
Your screenshot adds nothing of value to the the original content. Unless your blog includes extra info that isn't available on the linked page you should just post the original link here on reddit and save us an extra jump.
Both parties in Australia are much better at removing civil rights than protecting them.
So did I miss something or does this just mean that if you get arrested, they may keep you for longer? 
Yeah, this. Little stuff is no big deal. It's not like it's okay if someone gets drunk and breaks your TV or a family heirloom, that's when the interventionists get called in. But if someone's drunk and spills a little coffee and doesn't clean it up then who's really hurt in the scenario?
Have you heard the news about showerheads harboring lots of bacteria?
Nice! I love psychology, so it's always really interesting to learn these things. I guess distress and dysfunction would be the two biggest ones it seem, since that's really affecting your life. It's really bothering me right now, because I have been trying to hold off today on not doing the dirt thing, and it's driving me insane at the moment.   P.S. I need to find 2 girls 1 cyst!! I LOVE cyst videos!! 
Probably...
I told my little brother that a lime tree/tomatoe plant would grow in his tummy if he would eat their seeds... he's now 19 and still refuses to eat tomatoes/limes lol
Agreed. Not in the bald, middle-aged, straight, fatso sense. But with the rest of the sentence.
This guy probably would hate me. I write my books in longhand on a clipboard.
No, I was just very motivated.
Shhhh next you know potatoes get put on the controlled substance list and you will have to go to Mexico or the Netherlands to get your fresh fries.  
Learn the simple natural sciatica home treatment that can be found in your kitchen.
Didn't even think about doing this.  Thanks for the advice, posting there now.
...with another CP thread.
Way to miss the point.   I could give two shits if shes fucking someone else. It bothers me that its happening in the same apartment as me.  She has the right to do whatever the hell she wants, but you don't think its kind of a dick move to do it right infront of someone you supposedly still cared about?
Yeah mainly because nobody is ever punished for it. Regardless of whether the Tories would have done the same, Blair did do it.  Imagine if a rapist in court said that a whole bunch of people might have done the same thing. Doesn't alter the fact that person is a rapist.
cassettes actually came in 60 or 90 mins 
The relationship? Yes.
Downvoted for mentioning downvoting ;)
As a tiny person, no, they aren't.  The back- and neck-rests hit us funny and painfully contort our spines.  As best I can tell they're made for slightly-below-average people.  Either that or no one.
Make sure you have enough Brawndo in your diet. It's what your body craves
[Ectomorph, endomorph, mesomorph](http://www.bodybuildingforyou.com/articles-submit/andy-fairclough/body-types.htm).  You are probably an ectomorph, by your description. I am one, too. The [musclehacker](http://www.musclehack.com/how-to-get-six-pack-abs/) has good advice. I got to 4 packs on his program before dropping out.
That assumes the curve remains normal. If it bifurcates (my spell-checker says that's a real word, so there), we could have a small number of super-geniouses (wait, is my spell-checker even on?) counterbalancing a larger number of idiots, keeping the average at 100.
I'd agree with you, except for one little issue:  **ACTUALLY BUYING THE DAMN GAMES!**  In the days of 1-click Amazon purchases, why must I fill out a credit card form 30+ times, receiving a "Sorry there has been an error..." message each time, before it FINALLY buys the game? What kind of game-purchasing service (especially one that has been around for so long) can find it acceptable for their platform to fail so tremendously at actually letting you PURCHASE GAMES?  Right now, I've spent 30 minutes and used two different credit cards trying to buy the new Monkey Island, and I'll probably spend another 20 minutes or so until it works. Left4Dead2 took me an hour. *sigh*   **edit:** wow, downvoted? I agree with OP, its a great service. But they need to invest more in the right areas to actually make it as good as it could be. Have you all honestly never had a problem buying something from Steam? The forums are littered with pages of people having issues because their servers cant handle it.
No Freud or Giacometti?  Bull Shit
Off the top of my head: Fingerworks, Dylan, OpenDoc, HyperCard, Newton, and you could argue they had a part in the demise of Smalltalk as well. Who in their right mind hires Alan Kay and then makes him write C++ code?
34820ed45601193bb807c1f75d5e92933640f5f5
This FFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUU was so intense that he also ripped all of his hair out.
Gah. I can't do one. It will have to be 3 each.   Albums:  * American Idiot - Green Day  * Echoes, Silence, Patience &amp; Grace - Foo Fighters  * Digimortal - Fear Factory  Movies:  * Children of Men  * The Pianist  * LOTR Trilogy  edit: markup hates me.
as a kid I told my brother  that a lime tree/tomatoe plant would grow in his tummy if he would eat their seeds... he's now 19 and still refuses to eat tomatoes/limes lol
I've heard that the police chief has control over what gets aired on cops when it comes to his officers. Just in case a cop violates someone's civil rights &amp; its caught on camera etc etc..
wut
My friends/family know about reddit through me. I had to give up my 2 year old account so fewer of them know who I am on it.
In my experience, yes, the lotions with fragrances will burn worse.  In some cases much worse.
&gt;Whether individual neurons are capable of the stupid levels of number crunching you're attributing to them doesn't matter.  For starters, computation doesn't have to mean "number crunching". The simplest definition of it that I've ever read comes from mathematician, computer programming professor and computational theorist Rudy Rucker: "A computation is a nonrandom process that obeys finitely describable rules... the rules act as a kind of recipe for generating future states of computation."  By this definition, a computation takes place at every synaptic vesicle of every synapse of a nerve cell. Additionally, computations take place within cell organs.   On a functional level, we don't know enough about how the activity of our nerve cells leads to the phenomenon of consciousness to rule out anything as "noise". Hell, we don't even have a consensus on whether or not there even is such a thing as consciousness. As long as our best and brightest are in the business of offering educated guesses on the subject, it is plain old bad science to assume that we can ignore vast swaths of brain activity as insignificant to the problem's solution.  &gt;... science is full of extremely useful simplifications that make the work doable rather than fanciful nonsense like a head full of trillions of modern desktops worth of processing power. What use would it all be?   Yes, and science also has found that modeling some kinds of dynamic systems accurately is a devilishly difficult if not impossible task, because simplifications don't always do the trick.  What use would it all be?  How about support and infrastructure for the most complex object know to man, for starters?   Fanciful? Did you follow my above link to [this story](http://www.smartplanet.com/business/blog/smart-takes/scientists-build-biggest-artificial-brain-of-all-time-16-billion-neurons-as-smart-as-a-cat/2135/)?  excerpt:  *"Scientists have built the biggest artificial brain of all time using a supercomputer powered by ... millions of watts of electricity that's about as smart as a house cat."*  *"Don't believe in nature's awesome power? Consider that it took Dawn's acre-size footprint packed with 147,456 processors, 147,000 gigabytes of memory, 10 rows of racks, miles of cable, a million watts of electricity and 6,675 tons of air-conditioning equipment spouting 2.7 million cubic feet of chilled air to simulate the biological wiring found in your 10 lb. pet cat. And that's still one-eighty-third the amount of power your own brain can muster."*  **"The simulation ran 100 to 1,000 times slower than real-time."**  All that firepower, and the "about as smart as a cat" simulation still runs up to 1,000 X's slower than real-time. Where I come from, that's a verrrrry sloooowwww cat.  &gt;Do you honestly expect neurons to be so optimized that every structure that could carry out coherent calculation does? What pressure could possibly result in such an impossibly over-engineered biological system?  Who said that every structure has to play a role in everything that goes on all the time? Your home computer doesn't devote every ounce of its power to the solution of each problem you give it.  Nature has had billions of years to over-engineer the hell out of all sorts of biological systems. Ever hear of "junk DNA"?   &gt;... to suggest that an individual neuron (all by itself) is crunching away at whether this line I'm looking at is foreground or background or whatever is just goofy as hell.  That *is* a goofy suggestion. I didn't make it. You did.  &gt;.. to just throw out there in this very dismissive and arrogant way that the brain has this i-just-pulled-some insane-stat-out-of-my-ass-and-refuse-to-show-my-work capacity is question begging in the extreme.  Maybe you skipped over the 10-day old comment above where I cited my original source for my original comment. If so, here it is again:  My original claim comes from a book by Dr. Charles Jonscher called "The Evolution of Wired Life".   Jonscher doesn't have a PhD in neural science, granted, but he's a bonafide expert in computation [President of CET and leader, technology practice. Head of European Telecoms, Media &amp; Technology, Booz Allen &amp; Hamilton (1987-90). Formerly with IBM and BT research labs. Co-director of Telecommunications Research Program, MIT (1981-84). Lecturer Sloan School of Management and Faculty of Economics, Harvard University (1977-84).Extensive writing on business and technology. Education Cambridge (BA) and Harvard (MA, PhD).]  My original statement isn't a controversial one among people who have a competent understanding of nonlinear dynamics, cognitive science and computational science. Only among people who want to imagine that we're *like, totally a hairsbreadth away from the singularity, dude. Shit's gonna be like The Matrix in our lifetime!* get depressed when confronted with the reality that we've got mountains of work and a certain amount of good luck ahead of us before we even have a cat brain simulation that isn't functionally retarded.  Aside from that, this isn't some prestigious journal like *Nature* where you need to "show your work". It's a fucking comment thread in a subreddit. The 'nets are so cramful of ignorant bastards, it would be countless lifetimes' worth of work to educate all of them.   You need me to elaborate more?  Sorry. Not my job. 
Cool videos, tips, articles, and pics of everything bowhunting.
http://imgur.com/duPg5.jpg
That was my thinking.  However, it may just be that they're more visible and comfortable in the public eye than they were in the past.
I was struck by that as well.  Obviously, at the grocery store, you can tell the difference between free-range chicken and factory farm chicken because it says what it is right there on the label.  And with a few exceptions, food is generally labeled correctly.  Still, I think I see where they're coming from now that I read it over again.  From personal observations, there are vegetarians that think meat is delicious but avoid it for moral reasons, and there are vegetarians who are revolted on a visceral level by the idea of ingesting animal flesh and would get serious heebie-jeebies if they realized they had.  For the first type, finding out you'd eaten real meat would be no real problem because there would be no moral culpability.  For the second type, finding out you'd mistakenly eaten real meat would certainly be problematic.  So, I think they were saying that for their personal risk/reward assessment, they would be pretty wary of it.  Which would be a totally fair statement.  Of course, there are also probably some vegetarians who have neither an intellectual problem with killing animals nor a visceral problem with eating meat, but who merely avoid meat for practical reasons, such as its health effects or such as the energy required to produce it.  I doubt this type of vegetarian would be interested in synthetic meat at all unless it somehow addressed those concerns.
Oh, please. That's your theory? There's this worldwide conspiracy among all climate scientists because they can get research funding?  How about this: The fossil-fuel dependent industries are paying the global warming swiftboaters because they are afraid their profits will drop if they are forced to clean up after themselves? Seems like a far more likely scenario to me. 
One of my contracting companies has actually just offered me a full time position starting in february.  But yeah i'm sure the biweekly 2 $2 tecates has been what was holding me back all this time. 
ah, nevermind then. your solution makes more sense in that case.   Awesome stuff by the way :)
If anyone has tried homebrewing a bud ale please PM me your recipe. I've heard it can be done (THC is alcohol soluble), but I've never heard of a recipe. Cheers.
Strong woman.  Thanks to you, Sir, for your service.
Maybe they should be allowed to fire people for getting pregnant as well?  Edit: I guess my sarcasm didn't come across.
But these are not real vampire penises!
Basically, Encyclopedia Dramatica is ran by utter trolls. When they notice that a linked-to image is getting quite a few views, they'll change it to something else that is gross. I don't know what it is though.
LOL $2000 for an HP laptop.
That's also a fun game - trying to come up with a short list of the most inappropriate combination of items from a grocery store to make it look like you have a wild night of crazy sex planned.
This time of year, there's a little Turkey in all of us. 
Asante sana. Swahili for thank you.
You must be a girl....nice try!
Water-fat offworlder...
Me and my friends find its a lot better to look for pre-made teams.  Dont start with 4 ppl and get randoms to fill the other team since they will ragequit right away.  The only bad experiences i have had with 4vs4 pre-mades is when pings are atrocious.  Aside from that most teams will play right through, unless one team is getting completely wasted.
actually they are working on a system that uses pet pellets. pet pellets are hardly hard to get as basically any plastic objects are manufactured using them as well as the fact that we can easily recycle plastic into pellets using a simple mold system (not true for fibers as we can't get that level of precision)
You don't have to parse out sections of the where clause, you can simply log the search string you use to construct the clause in the first place.
Reddit is a secret code, man.
1. Calling alleged uneducated major arab terrorists camel jockeys is quite mild dont you think? 2.Taking flying lessons in a single engine Cessna does not equate to a person capable of piloting of a 300 tonne aircraft.  3. You are right landing is the hard part but that does not mean the rest is easy. 4. How do I know this - Does 25 years in the industry as an engineer qualify me to have an opinion?
death from above 1979 - cold war
I still think her arms look a bit too strangely positioned...
leave the cartridge in milk and honey overnight
 The passion isn't necessarily "traveling" as much as it may indicative of a joy for trying new things. With that in mind, keep trying different hobbies! Whatever you do, don't compare yourself with currently passionate hobby-having friends and think of yourself as somehow being unable to feel the same thing.   ALL PEOPLE have a passion. You simply haven't found it. I wouldn't worry about it unless you're 83 years old.  :)   Best of luck!
Since when does open hatred and bigotry deserve *kindness*!?   That's the exact liberal nonsense I've come to despise. Yes, it's ok if they "hate fags," because it's freedom of speech! Let's just be nice to them and hope they suddenly have a change of heart... Give me a break.  EDIT for an afterthought: And what about the legally accepted concept of *self-defense*? It's something we all readily accept for physical attacks, why cannot it not be used against *verbal* attacks? Why do we have to sit around and accept blatant and ignorant hostility and repay it with respect?
skevinc, I'm a bit humbled by the fact that you understand what it means to start at the bottom. So, that's good. No sense of entitlement that old guys like me, (50) hear my generation complain when talking of yours.  I fall in the middle. Having read Schlosser's Fast Food Nation, and since you're in the food industry, you might have some sympathy. Food workers are the largest employee group in the US, are routinely taken advantage of, and earn very little in the way of job skills or satisfaction. What I would like for you to consider is that it only takes a few board meetings to turn a once good job into a terrible job. This has happened in as many industries as you can think of including machinists, rubber workers, meatpackers, and the list goes on and on. Unions are certainly not the bad guy as they've been made out to be by ranting stalwarts of the right. Unions may have been too powerful in some arenas, but the market takes care of that indulgence as we've seen in the automotive industry.  To recap: unions, not bad.
No, it didn't. The kinetic energy was absorbed by the walls and steel beams on the exterior of the building. A small amount was heat.   Its all somewhat speculative. But people who know a lot about fires and structural steel think it is unlikely that the temperatures were hot enough to make a difference. It gets MUCH more unlikely when you consider that these temperatures that are borderline reachable in a well controlled jet fuel fire would need to be reached evenly over many of the remaining beams to cause the type of failure observed, and then make them fail all at the same time.   Not impossible, but certainly difficult to achieve by smashing an airplane into a building and causing a fire. 
Didn't you hear? winter's been cancelled due to global warming.
We do what we must because we can.
I'd like to see the reddit alien with a television for a head, and his antenna as the television antenna. And maybe have him holding a remote?
Muhammad was the seal of the prophets. If you do not believe that then you are not a Muslim. Don't try to water down Islam with your invented ideologies.  Belief that Muhammad is the last and final messenger in Islam is among the pillars of faith. I strongly suggest *you* do some more reading about Islam.  Also, with regards to your sect, there is a famous hadith from Muhammad where he draws a line in the sand and offshoots to the left and right of it. He said that at the head of each offshoot is a devil (a deviant) that is calling to a particular sect, and that the only correct path is the center path, that which he and his companions were on.  You have to ask yourself: what authenticated sources can you rely upon? I hope you accept the Quran with the understanding of Muhammad's companions and their proceeding two generations as well as authenticated narrations that can be independently traced back to Muhammad by reliable narrators.  If you can accept those two basic fundamental principles of Islam then I hope you can see why you are being criticized for calling yourself a Muslim.
You are right....I admit I didn't make it through the review.  I just get sick of seeing people complain about the content of a book that isn't written for them...that being said, aren't we the people that say that video games don't affect the way we act, that we don't imitate what we see in movies or books?
Trolls trolling troll trolled trolls?
I'd say they're good actors with the amount of people they've been able to convince with their performance. Once you start fact checking though, you realize they're full of shit.
This was under Don'ts  &gt;Be **rude** when someone doesn't follow Reddiquette: Just point them here politely. And keep in mind that these are just guidelines.  Maybe you should read the Reddiquette yourself. It's not polite to call someone a "cunt."
I am a native to the Faroe Islands, and I feel it is imperative I set the record straight on this subject.  The images are real enough and are representative of the killing of these Pilot whales, but first I have a few minor corrections:  It is not a festival, we are not members of the EU and the Pilot Whale is not a Dolphin!  Those of you interested in a more balanced analysis of the facts, please visit the following page http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Whaling_in_the_Faroe_Islands
FTA: Once reality shatters the airy edifice, we will scream and yell like petulant children to be rescued, saved and restored to comfort and complacency. There will be no shortage of demagogues, including buffoons like Sarah Palin, who will oblige. We will either wake up to face our stark new limitations, to retreat from imperial projects and discover a new simplicity, as well as a new humility, or we will stumble blindly toward catastrophe and neofeudalism.
Too bad they didn't destroy their economies back then in time to fund a undemocratic global government, per the Copenhagen Treaty, in order to stop the climate change.  Suckers.
Poorly written schadenfreunde = 330 upvotes on Reddit
I thought karmanaut was a girl. What part part of a female body would increase in size based on karma? Labia, clit or tits?
My religion believes that all religions have elements of truth, but that all human institutions are transcended by God's divine truth. Atheism approves (more than you do this guy, i mean)?
:O  You *are* the luckiest man in the world!
Agreed. Sucks that the relationship ended, but that is how these things go sometimes.
I hate to rain on your parade but this only amuses stoners. Everyone else will just think you're dumb.  People don't smoke to die. They smoke to get a jump of the most potent stimulant available over the counter, nicotine.   You can't compare short term effects with long term effects (apples and oranges) and expect to have uncovered insight. Unless you're high, then you'll think it's brilliant... :P
Audit would hurt (MY) economic prospects: Bernanke   There. I fixed it for you.
I drove a cab two years and once did 98.
With the dopamines that are being released in your head you should feel amazing after a good run. You definately want to push a bit, but there is a point where it is too much, and then you'll damage your ankles and have to stop running for a few months. I have a friend that constantly pushes himself too hard and damages his body to the point where he has to stop pretty much all physical activity for months on end.
the quote is heavily bent to fit the context.  Quit saying epic please. Thank you.
I can hear a wider range than most of the people in the room with me (out of 4,17-24). Two of them complain of intense pain on several of the midrange tones, but can't hear more than 5 or so. The 17yo and myself (24) can hear the bulk of the tones clearly, but none of them hurt.
I don't understand your lack of falsifiability comment. Can you elaborate?
so your saying Jochem Marotzke and the Hadley center does not practice science?  Contradict yourself much?
&gt; I'll never not loathe a job. I'm going to come off incredibly childish here, but.. i hate taking orders from people. I hate it to my core. I hate schedules, i hate deadlines, i hate calendar appointments, i hate monitoring systems emailing my blackberry all fucking day, i HATE being on-call. I hate kissing someone's ass, or at least not being able to stand up for myself when I feel i've been slighted.  I feel the same way. My job is actually pretty good for a job, but I just don't like following schedules, showing up at meetings, doing what I'm told, or checking my pager. Other jobs might be higher paid, but they would have even more of the stuff I don't like, plus stricter deadlines and a tiny cube instead of an office.  I agree with your earlier comment that selling your mind and labor is not all that different from stripping. I'm a woman, but I just wouldn't be comfortable as a stripper or any good at it unless I got implants, orthodontics or veneers, and a more extroverted or at least a regular personality instead of extremely introverted. Since I'm not really good at anything, other than doing well in all my high school classes and AP exams (which led to an impressive-looking Bachelor's degree), and have poor people skills, I'm pretty much stuck in IT. 
I just *hate* how time passes, don't you?
Yes.  Fuck Michael Moore.  I fucking hate that shrill douchebag.  He is the Rush Limbaugh of the left.  I've read two of his books and both of them made me want to stab myself in the face in frustration.  As you pointed out, Obama never said he would pull out of Afghanistan.  However, regardless of what he said during the campaign, we are talking about a war here.  This isn't like health care policy, where the situation is pretty much the same today as it was 20 years ago, disregarding economic upturns and downturns.  Wars are constantly changing, and part of the reason the president can make unilateral decisions about how to change our course in them is because they require decisive, reactive strategy to win.  We elected Obama because he appears to careful reason through his decisions, so when he makes a decision regarding the NEW situation in Afghanistan, we should assume that he is making a reasonable decision.  The same goes for Iraq.
It's already 1 December in the bottom half of the world.  Have to wait a whole nother day.
Both parties in Australia are much better at removing civil rights than protecting them.
I like the "Ooze" because its a fun word to say, much like scuba or duodenum.  Also, I can't help but be annoyed by all the little snide suggestions that this decade should be named "the decade Americans were more shitty than Americans were before." We had a shitty President. We didn't all become assholes because of it. Newsflash snobby old people: your generations were just as shitty. GTFO our naming meeting.
I don't know why, but me and my friends used to always just say "Elephants" We'd say things like "Hey, let's go look at the elephants"  We were retarded.
Mine is called [Marvin](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marvin_the_Paranoid_Android). 
df15123c22a31941e6d936a1e87f7790c6a54f21
I tend to think that environment has a factor in it too.  Some people get sexually excited from feet, or elbows... some even have very extreme fetishes such as [emetophilia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Emetophilia).  I don't think they were born with that attraction.  I don't want to offend anyone either, I just have always thought your environment and events in your youth have a big impact on who you are.
I AM watching it on repeat lol
And people still suggest openoffice despite the fact that as far as I know it still only supports two different viewing modes. Normal view is a godsend. 
ok, how about a pic of her carving "Hi Reddit!" into a dead bowel or something.
Congratulations and best wishes for a long and happy marriage! 
Not really, but ok...
If it was his kitten, then I would give a fuck.  Kittens are awesomeeee!
It's like if the guy who wrote this never heard about The Machinist.
Bacon of Chaos
Why the sarcasm?
True but it is not a good sign when the untested chemical in question recently killed somebody who ingested it. 
I'm in a mood for Italian food.
Well, you're right.  I'd still suggest the older black person be respectful, and most actually are. 
Why are you so sensitive about terrorists?
Go for a walk on drugs.
&gt;Depressed people have a shortage of a neurotransmitter called GABA  Ive been taking ssri and and doing it wrong it seems.
A little off topic but i love Al Bundy he should be in every show and do the local news. Edit: it appears off is a tricky word to spell.
In an open letter, Stuart Littlewood asks Archbishop of Canterbury Rowan Williams: “What courageous thing will you and your colleagues do this Christmas-time to intervene and bring humanity, practical relief and spiritual help to all those Christian and Muslim families who for years have been so cruelly oppressed and abused by the Israeli regime and its supporters?”
"This is horse stance. Now stand like that until I come back." (To my future hubby on his first day of kung fu practice...it took a year or two before we dated, but once we started dating, the first thing we did was give each other black eyes in a sparring match.)
I believe the Smoker has a slightly shorter range, but a quicker recharge, now. I don't have empirical data to verify this, but that's how it feels.
Lettings cats use Reddit? That's quite a slippery slope if you ask me...
Did you have to take into account the coriolis effect?
Holy shit. I used to be in a very similar situations.  A few years ago I had serious issues w/ OCD, like you, and was prescribed Prozac. The OCD was crushing, medication didn't seem to help, even made things worse. I smoked a lot of pot, eventually stopped taking the prozac. One day I couldn't get any weed, so I decided I'd try DXM. Long story short, I took 600mg, passed out, was found by my parents later who thought I was having a stroke (I couldn't stand up, REM etc.). I remember bits and pieces of lying on the floor, not being able to move, speech extremely slurred, while the paramedics arrived. Woke up in the hospital the next day, still very dizzy (that weird sort of DXM dizzy). It was bad.  I didn't really do anything wrong, I did my research, the dosage was high, but certainly reasonable, and I wasn't on prozac at the time, but even still, it was definitely a desperate move. I'm speaking more to the similarities in our situations.
But it won't be Terrence Howard "next time", and recasting makes me a sad panda...
Nice try, Future boy/girl.  We're on to you. Reveal your secrets!
What you eat depends on your goals and needs, but for how much, there's some pretty quick, relatively accurate, scientifically backed calculations called the [Harris Benedict equation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Harris-Benedict_equation) that you can use to get a pretty good idea of how many calories you need.  Combine the number you get from that calculation with the fact that a pound of bodyfat is 3500 calories and you can scale your numbers for weight loss or gain.  Track you intake and tweak it from week to week and you'll be able to get a good sense for where you need to be in terms of calorie intake.
FUCK. THAT. SHIT.
| is the game color blind friendly?  Yes!  There's a colorblind mode that you can enable in the options menu.
You mean 7 keystrokes?  In Word 2007 click once on Review, click once on Word Count.  I'm not defending Word here really, it is a hunk of shit, but I just find the fascination with vi to be bizarre.  \[edit: I just realized Word 2007 gives a word count on the status bar at the bottom of the screen, so you don't actually have to click anything.  You can also click that word count indicator to bring up the same thing as Review &gt; Word Count.  Kinda slick actually.\]
The only vays to kill a Russian is by stake through heart or complete decapitation.
get a 3gs
Should I have married that girl I loved when we were 24 instead of thinking I could do better?  Instead I just fucked a couple crazy chicks over the next eight years and ended up alone, reading AskReddit.
"Come one come all, to a beautiful show! It's gonna be awesome and.... some other stuff! Doo dee dee dee doo dee dee dee doo dee dee doo dee. And some other MUSICAL STUFF!"
but stupid seems more likely...
Psalm 137, vv. 8 and 9.
Mid 30s, Male, Northern CA.  Vegetarian for three years, mostly eat vegan.  Started because animal proteins/fats/something caused me stomach pains, continue for that and all the usual reasons.
Less creepy than raising animals on unnatural diets, never allowing them to move, then violently slaughtering them in an assembly line.
It's his home too. Are you saying it's ok for her to make him feel uncomfortable in their home when she could just do it elsewhere? What she has done is rude. That is obvious. 
I love that song for warming up, but the school won't allow any lyrics.  Even those...
http://www.care2.com/c2c/people/profile.html?pid=764336604
&gt; That my son at age (Almost) 4 is already eating me out of house n home  Try quoting the whole sentence. 
I used to read Maddox when he updated it. And then he wrote a book, and I was like, "that's pretty cool". But once he got famous, I saw him in videos and stuff, and I realized what a big phony he was. He was all giddy and totally blew his "I hate everything" act. Big let-down.
Stewie?
I had this sweet super soaker that could spray over my power lines and I saw a car coming so I did a 2-3 seconds spray in the air moving along with the car. I had mistakenly timed it perfect and watched as the entire stream came down following the car's open sun room getting the entire blast in the car. I ran into a corn field when I saw the brake lights.
The Capresso MG600 brews 10 cups of coffee in under 8 minutes for maximum flavor and aroma with its 1000 Watt heating element. The unique stainless steel-lined heating system eliminates water contact with aluminum and reduces the need for decalcifying. Not enough time for a full pot? The MG600 has a special setting to brew 3 to 5 cups while retaining the full aroma hidden in your freshly roasted coffee beans. An AM/PM Programmable Clock/Timer lets you set the time when to brew automatically,and the “Stop-And-Serve” function allows you to enjoy a cup of coffee before brewing is completely finished. Additionally, the clock and programming will hold their settings in the event there is a short power outage or need to unplug the MG600 (for less than 10 seconds at a time).   
I did mine with a paintball gun. I was riding in a pickup in a field and I jokingly bet my friend fifty bucks. I could shoot a T-post from about 100 yards away with one hand while standing in the back of a moving truck. I amazingly hit the post.
I think it would be difficult to figure out.  You could go by red and blue districts or states, but that would just show you that at least 51% of the people voted one way or the other and in reality there could be another 49% of the opposite political leaning there all on assistance.  1 in 8 Americans are on it and 1 in 4 children.  Some [stats](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Supplemental_Nutrition_Assistance_Program#Statistics)  like this:  *41 percent of participants are white; 36 percent are African-American, non-Hispanic; 18 percent are Hispanic; 3 percent are Asian, 2 percent are Native American, and 1 percent are of unknown race or ethnicity.*  Would seem to indicate (if you also look at voter break down) that people on assistance lean Democrat at least slightly  - in actual  (recent) voting trends though probably many are registered Independent.
Shit. Nuclear Holocaust comes around you are going to be LOADED!
Am I ever going to take control of my life and do something of meaning?
Only in America, where Republicans consider themselves patriots for not pointing out the lies of their leaders.
I work for a Japanese company in California, that has a very large percentage of Japanese-Japanese employees (as opposed to Japanese-American). I can confirm the frustrating aspects of conversation. I thought British people were polite (I am one, and thus can say that) but MY GOD! I'd say 80% of the Japanese people I work with are polite to the point of absurdity. Audible voice levels are close to zero, mouths always covered, nervous giggles. Heaven forbid if i were to walk briskly around a corner in the office and *almost* bump into someone. OH HAI some days a reaction to an almost-bump is a near-60-second diatribe of very odd apologizing. chest-grasping, what appears to be 500% of the needed amount of feigned surprise, etc etc. 
Latin translation:  After this, therefore from this.
Exactly. Boy, I would have been pissed if my college wouldn't let me graduate until I quit smoking.
Be prepared to fail.
I TOTALLY LOVE YOU! TOTALLY 90's!
&gt; Your throwing around the phrase "Police State", and when you use it like you are, you take away its power.  I disagree, obviously.  When I was in college, I was close to becoming a polisci major; needless to say, I took many political science courses.  I was taught the-then definition of a police state: Any state where the gov't could seize you off the street, and throw you in jail without charges and without trial.  The US meets that definition. The US is a police state -- the American people no longer have Habeas Corpus rights. Fortunately, the gov't does not yet use its police state powers widely, but that does not alter the fact that the US is a police state.  The US gov't has held US citizens incommunicado in prison without charges for literally *years*. Those are the indefensible actions of a police state.  What happened next? The US relies on propaganda that we are the "land of the free" and all that rot. So to keep that propaganda believable, we are now changing the definition of a police state so that the US is excluded.  It's sort of like torture. We executed Japanese war criminals for waterboarding Americans in WWII.  But now the US gov't has redefined torture so that waterboarding is merely an "enhanced interrogation technique".
Excellent. Thank you.
Related - I met with the OS build team at Microsoft some time back, and they revealed that Vista was built with only a few tools - cl, link, NMAKE, and build.exe, basically.  Anything more complicated (devenv, msbuild, etc) was explicitly rejected; those build engineers insisted on simple, well-understood, predictable methods - and the build engineers were as senior as many of the kernel developers.
Try to join a group of l4d2 players and make some online friends.  Honestly, if you are trying to play versus or survival with randoms someone is guaranteed to quit, and its almost a guarantee 4+ people will quit.
Not in science.  The preservation of data is absolute KEY to the scientific process.  If you throw away data, you are a very very poor scientist.
Nice! I love psychology, so it's always really interesting to learn these things. I guess distress and dysfunction would be the two biggest ones it seem, since that's really affecting your life. It's really bothering me right now, because I have been trying to hold off today on not doing the dirt thing, and it's driving me insane at the moment.   P.S. I need to find 2 girls 1 cyst!! I LOVE cyst videos!! 
I've been living in a cave for a long time for this.  Secret of Monkey Island for $2.49... click.
Try writing a letter to Jack Black and make it funny/awesome. Also, try talking to arena/club/venue owners and tell them you think there'd be a market for this band and have them contact their booking agent or whoever.
To me the best thing about Transmission is the remote web interface.  I can check my downloads from my iPod Touch from my couch.  No running into the office every hour to see how things are going.
I think it's Monkeypoppyclipse.  I could be wrong.
irony anyone?
I understand if you don't want to get into it because you seem to be quite upset but after you limited all your symptoms and the fact you suffer from brain damage, may I ask what happened or what your overall condition would be called? Just curious.
Discrimination isn't just "being mean". Discrimination is doing things differently based on some quality of the person. It's not necessarily illegal or immoral. Sometimes it's a necessary and good thing. We shouldn't make it into a bad word that gets applied to any action we don't like.  If no one else can buy adjacent seats, then it would actually be discrimination to offer them specifically for obese people. Not discriminating would be to hold to the same policy for all passengers regardless of size.  If obese people are required to purchase two seats when others aren't, then that is discrimination because the policy is conditional on their size. It's not illegal (obesity is not a protected class) and it's probably a good idea, but it's still discrimination.
haha That'd be perfect. There's the skeptic's annotated bible, but I'd love to see someone go through the bible and annotate all the problems that the bible has in it, including the archeological evidence and the lack of supporting evidence for historical events.   Interesting side note: apparently some church decided to try and "answer" the problems pointed out by the Skeptic's Annotated Bible. And amusingly enough, unlike the Skeptic's Annotated Bible you've gotta [pay to view](http://skepticsannotatedbible.org/order.htm). Check out the "Examples" section, and if that's the best they've got it is pretty damn pathetic.   It is rather amusing the difference between the religious and the irreligious, almost every irreligious/atheist source is free (ie The Talk Origins Archive, the Skeptic Annotated Bible, etc), unless it is an actual book. The religious demand that you pay to view their bullshit even when if they really cared they should give out their information for free. 
Wow. Why didn't I see that?  Yeah, that's even worse.
let her decide that.  stop worrying so much -- she's with you because she wants to be.  :)
Alton Brown disagrees with you.
Replace soda with malt liquor and we're talking six. 
There's no room for god in science.  Scientists have enough religious people to worry about. Don't make them worry about atheists too.
Even the most popular articles get 25-30% downmodded, with little to no explanation. 
Holy shit man, thank you. you should be compensated.
Sorry to use your phone but your housemate's phone wasn't working so she gave me your number.
Go and watch a movie.
I have a pretty good idea of what getting hit in the head with a soccer ball or fist smells like.  
I was playing Mario Party, on a 3 dice roll, and went, "Yo, what if I roll 3 9s?"  I rolled 3 9s.  I grabbed 3 darts in my hand, and threw them by the tails, overhand, from regulation distance. 2 were bullseyes, 1 was a 3x20.  About to be knocked out of a game of Risk, 3 territories left, drew a card, got a match for 50 new units. Won.
I used to think it was impossible, then I discovered Metamucil... or as I like to call it, "The one wipe miracle."   EDIT: Funny thing is, it's actually no wipes, but no way I'm risking that.
Good for Huckabee. He doesn't belong anywhere but his position at fox news.
To piss off Roger Ebert.
Your comment is a little confusing. All I am saying is that your counter of "well companies will just be even more fucking awful in pursuit of profit if you unionize" is a silly argument. It is like saying to a black in the 50s and 60s "don't demand equal treatment, you will just get hosed and bitten by dogs." I mean, maybe it is true. But who does the blame fall on if the company would rather make things more awful than take a hit in excess money. Mind you again, not actual money used to pay for capital and labor expenditures, just the excess money.
it's like when windows freezes
It seems that only a few cursed at her. Overall, he set a tone that was playful with an apt (if not a bit nicer) analogy. Focusing on the few bits of negativity would be somewhat of a shame, given that most people absorbed hate and used it as the base for standing together.
My spouse of 23 years just informed me that it was years of dating on and off before she actually knew my last name.
They live in one of those mazes you get when you're a kid.  The sort of multi level, clear plastic mazes with marbles.  You had to turn them around and flip them upside down to get the ball to the end.
No, I was talking about the ER service.
I think what people associate with "natural" is something that works as a piece of the whole of nature.  The ant colony is self sustaining and lives in a balance with other natural things around it. The city does not.  We're just doing natural wrong and need to fix it. The ants have it down and we are still learning.  
Approximately 135mph, in my 91 3000GT, down an empty straight highway stretch at about 4am.
book case is boring.  i suggest stairs. have a set of stairs leading up to the wall, and paint, or stick, some sort of loft-looking thing above the stairs. people will try and climb the stairs and get into the loft, only pulling on the rope to get into the loft will activate some sort of trap.  the real way to access the area behind the stairs will be twofold (and electromagnetical). you can configure it such that you need to activate a switch, and then bring a magnet near the side of the stairs to unlock it. thus it isn't possible to get in if the eletricity is off in the house, HOWEVER, from the inside you should still be able to get out (via some scheme). i think it's possible.
Sure, but these are the 10 books that people should read; it doesn't mean that a priori everyone wants to. It's really a failure of the education system. It's easy to sit down with a child, or even an adult, and if they give you a little bit of time instill a sense of wonder at a lot of these topics. If the school system did this regularly, people would love reading these books. This is another reason to read Plato, the socratic method is a beautiful and effective teaching method.  It doesn't matter if you don't like Sartre, the point is that he has had a profound impact on your life; in many ways he's defined what we consider to be modern. You can, and should, disagree, but it doesn't mean you shouldn't make an effort to understand.  If you just read literature, you won't develop the analytical skills required to have an understanding of the world. You actually have to actively think about things, can't absorb them by osmosis.
Definitely. Fortunately I haven't been in this position myself, but I've heard of insurance companies trying to severely low ball cyclists. The BF threads have a huge deal of information on how to deal with the insurance, what to ask for and avoid getting screwed over. 
HOAs = Pocket Nazis with too much time on their hands.
Horse apples. This situation would never happen.
That is full of awesome.
Hmm....yeah it can be really bad like the recent church covering up of child abuse in Ireland. But there is dispute among religious people. Religious people who think "shit...those fuckers are giving us a bad name" (obviously they would never swear but..). I think that what you hate is religious extremism which tbh i haven't really experienced. So maybe your experiences are what have shaped your strong views...the impression i get from the media is that Christianity (baptism) in America is very extreme and a lot more hard line, for example it is unheard of in England for pastors etc to attempt to convert gays. Although there was some recent controversy over a gay bishop.  After reading my previous comments I realise that I came across rude, insulting and overly dismissive...So I apologise.
You saw the "collapse" with your own eyes from where exactly?  That "collapse" did not look like a controlled demolition to you?  Seriously?  All of WTC was demolished.  Insurance money, hiding government secrets.  Just because somehow you aren't "compelled" doesn't mean those aren't good explanations.
As an Asian, I'll eat grown lab meat.
Thank you, kind sir.  I'll leave that unedited for others to see.  Upon reading your comment, however, I realised that I had forgotten to close dgilfoy's original quotation!  Never mind; I'll leave that, too.  Upvotes all around!
Won't someone think of the paint manufacturers?!
I have some bad news for you about modular arithmetic.
k will look for this thank you 
It's slightly more difficult when you could have any hardware configuration at all.
Good tips for buying a used laptop computer. 
America is Canada's Depends®
Last I heard, 82% of employees don't have much say it how many days a week they have to work.
Ismailis?
DUI?  Fuck you, you deserve the worst, and hopefully, you'll get it.
Right. I'm not sure about that at all.
I think that was covered by no hope.
picture as advertised. would click again.
I bet she got a raise.
cia.gov/careers/
*"We apologise for the inconvenience."*
Same! 3 months of summer with no shaving or haircutting.  Thank god for rain.
It's to wake you up so that you don't miss your sleep in
Somehow the fact that that guy looks like he's 12 makes it even better.
"I can't believe there are conservatives out there who won't let their kids read Harry Potter but somehow, on some planet, consider this book to be acceptable. This book has soo much more to teach on bad morals and living an unhealthy life than the Harry Potter books came close to portraying"  it teaches girls about being co dependent, unhealthy, being with an abusive man, but it doesn't have magic :) cause magic is satans work and everything else is ok 
It all started when my mom cooked my breakfast **with** hog.  *gotta show bacon love on reddit*
holy crap.  at the two minute mark it shows that her a-hole has a little tail growing on it.  
He said pop rocks, not bread
He better as hell had. If not he might have missed humanities one opportunity to stop the Zombie Apocalypse!!!
Better out than in . . .
http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/a9gt1/after_watching_this_video_i_have_a_hard_time/c0gh31f Context: Extremist muslim giving a speech   -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- glimlie: im a muslim and i can safely say this crazy nutjob doesnt represent me nor any of my views. Its stupid asses like this that really piss me off. Scholar my ass... doesnt have a braincell in his head. But even worse, i hate the people who actually watch this and put me in the same catergory as this idiot.   -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Ukoutlaw21 (very strongly upvoted): ...but you do believe some stupid-ass shit....   -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- glimlie (downvoted): what makes you think you know what i think? you dont see me making assumptions about your beliefs   -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- pyx (very strongly upvoted): you believe in god? that is some pretty stupid-ass shit....   
Nothing, they wouldn't care.  I could probably tell my professors (they already know I work at a "nightclub") and they'd be cool.  What I do with my time is something my school wouldn't care about, legally and personally.
I've seen DR spies clean up plenty of times. On crappy players. As someone who mains soldier, a DR spy is more of a pest than a threat. Your cloak *relies* on me *seeing you* for it to work. Rule 1 of playing spy: DON'T BE SEEN. Period. If you're breaking that rule, you're tightening the game of the entire other team.
feteti and feteti seem to make surprisingly similar comments in a lot of ways.
That's odd. This was listed pretty much EVERYWHERE as being December 1st. I swear, I must have seen it in two or three places -- newspaper, and on rhymesayers and they all listed it as Dec 1st.   You should try for a refund if you don't find someone. That's bullshit to change the date when they otherwise had it listed on another day everywhere else.   I can't make it myself, but good luck. :/   edit: Yeah, even the REMG website is still listing this as tomorrow:   remgentertainment.com  And the Facebook event:  http://www.facebook.com/event.php?eid=274769510262&amp;index=1   Eye Weekly:  http://www.eyeweekly.com/music/ondisc/article/77821  &gt;Eyedea and Abilities play the El Mocambo (464 Spadina Av) Dec 1.  Myspace:  http://music.myspace.com/index.cfm?fuseaction=music.showDetails&amp;friendid=3720328&amp;Band_Show_ID=38594310  Someone done fucked up bad.
you probably either live in a common law state or one that recognizes same-sex marriage.
I heerd hes a moslim too! Jerb taking, food giving, Kenyan, moslim, agerator.
I'm completely comfortable agreeing with you, but can you back it up before we close the book on it? Seems the OP was trying to get at exactly that.
So do I, but I've noticed my comprehension and reading speed goes way down.  I use this to my advantage.  Only when I'm reading for pleasure will I smoke, and then I find myself getting way more into the plot/character development.  If it's for school, it's just not worth it because I can't retain as well.  
A 16 year old is going to have rampant sex no matter what you say to him.
It can. I can play sniper better on servers in the UK, as the lag compensation gives me crazy shots that I totally missed because the guy walked around a corner. On US servers I just miss :(
Most people probably already avoided this one, but Overlord II was an absolute bore. You think playing as a bad guy is going to be fun until your *forced* to play as one.   Besides that almost everything outside of a small list(monsters,super stardust HD, fat princess) of games from PSN has been a disapointment.
Dude... did you read my comment?
How do you get to the French Laundry??
Just buy it for however much it is right now. I don't care if you need that money for food, go buy TF2.
You're right, Islam didn't necessarily emerge from the same culture.  Islam's origins as is written in the Qu'ran did not necessarily come from the Arabian peninsula, but was instead more likely from a more Northern area, repurposed by the autocracy years later to have originated in a more uniquely Arab area as a way of differentiating their culture from that of the Christian and Jewish communities that tended to cluster more heavily near the Byzantines.  Not that this has been proven, but just pointing out that it's not even a consensus that Islam originated in the Arabian peninsula.
Actually you could just repeat the same 2 or 3 comments in succession endlessly and cut your replying time by 85%
I second this.  Rock solid game type with an added rpg twist.
It's like they won Solitaire in real life.
*technology and culture go hand in hand, they create, shape, and change each other.*  With this I agree, if you expand it to: technology, learning, and genetics go hand-in-hand with culture and shape it as they are in turn shaped by it.  There was no downvote.
As long as you don't believe in "the magic" that gives us free will, all that we create are just a product of our environment and genes(which is also a product of our environment..)   Thus if you subscribe to a deterministic world view(as most atheists/scientists/redditors do) everything created by humans are also considered natural and not "dirtied" by our "un-natural"(there enters the magic) free-will. In this case natural vs artificial is just a semantic tool to distinguish between things that one specific animal(humans) have made and every other object.  Does tools created by chimps count as artificial? I say its a highly artificial(the word in it's right use) semantic construct.
I saw kickme's original post, but didn't sign up until after the subreddit had been created.
and?....
That isn't really how it went. Her decision to move, I was getting a new apartment anyway - just ended up working out. She had planned to get a job prior to moving but then just completely failed. There was no agreement for me to support her, and there was a complete understanding to pay this money back until very recently.
Ooh. I've heard the Red Sparrowes, but not Yndi Halda. Thanks!
www.misprintedtrivialpursuitcards.com
๏̯͡๏﴿
How do you get google voice?
He is not representative of Islam in the least.
Jesus hung with Prostitutes and tax collectors both considered evil.  He did not however condone the fact that they were tax collectors and whores but instead brought them to the light as it were.  He did not just accept any and all aspects of their lives... it is not bigotry to think something is wrong or immoral. 
Like losing an old friend.  Don't worry, you can always pick up where you left off.
I'll paypal you a jelly donut. Would that work? Hey, maybe I just figured out a new business venture. Anyone want to help me design a site for business to business jelly donut transactions?
What's the proper answer. I recently learned the average was supposed to be around 10 but that still seems awfully low to me. What do you say to not get into trouble? 
Do you make her sandwiches?
Lake Louise kicks ass
I don't know which is worse: that you take (and share!) photos of your dog's impressive fecal sculptures or that I intentionally look at said pictures.
Met him @ E3 this year. The guy is really nice. I hope to one day interview him for my site.
I should have not eaten that Chipotle burrito for lunch.
same as obama winning the nobel peace prize and then sending more troops to afghanistan. it's not that these people aren't doing what they're awarded for. They are, but it's for the people they're doing it for....but wait, reddit says there's no nwo, so why go any further.
wow that looks like great skiing
There is a difference between subtle and just not showing us anything about a major set of characters whose motivations are behind numerous events.
You hit the nail on the head with that comment.
"choice" is the wrong term to put to it. the debate is more in line with nature-vs-nurture.  like most aspects of animal behavior, it's probably a mix between the two.  one way to look at it is to ask this with alternative phrasing, "*Is heterosexuality genetic*"? or more plainly, "*Is sexuality genetic?*" I believe most people would accept that the answer is an obvious yes.  however, sexual behavior varies widely across human cultures. clearly there are learned social influences.
craigslist, duh!
so if no-one said she was 16, who would have noticed? let's see here, oh yeh, NOBODY! i gotta love how an 18 year old is an adult and 17 year old is a child that needs all our help and protection.
Did you used to be 20 years old and now you are 30+?  
so, do ethics prevent using that *power* to stop rape and murder in sub-saharan Africa?
&gt;Starbucks has to deal with brand resistance not because it is an actual trend in marketing, but because 80% of their customers are hipster assholes (expert credentials: I've lived in san francisco for 2 years).  Well yeah, I suppose because you live in hipster capitol of the world. (Or at least in the top 5).  For the rest of the world, Star Bucks represents Hipster-posers and soccer moms.
Your reaction was disturbingly gleeful considering the indirect impact this has caused to millions of children and the enviroment, and will do for many years to come. 
I never realized how expensive these face lifts can be. One of the best things we can do to take care of our skin is to eat healthy organic food and drink plenty of purifed water. It's funny how many people will plop down $6k for a face lift but they won't eat healthy because it's "too expensive"
Rebalance the economy to focus on innovation and creating new value, not extracting it.  Our sharpest minds are being siphoned off by Wall Street, to extract hundreds of billions in wealth for themselves.  At best they generate little to nothing of value, at worst they crash the entire financial system. What if their best incentive was in developing cheap alternative energy, or cheaper healthcare techniques, or mobile telecom that actually worked, or more efficient food distribution... anything that makes smarter use of resources and generates net wealth for the economy?  What if the government encouraged it with a small fraction of what it spends to subsidize the oil and agribusiness industries? Even our best estimate of growth, the GDP, is largely a tally of money being shoveled around.  Why are there no topline stats at least attempting to track innovation and real wealth creation?  The closest we have is productivity measures, more easily manipulated by how much you can screw the hired help than how much innovation you've created.  The feedback only helps a few people get rich, and ignores whether they're doing so by generating new wealth, or taking it from others.
Not paying for housing means I have more money to spend on coffee. Don't judge me. 
I suppose there could be evidence that shows that each species arose independently, e.g. if their DNA sequences were completely unrelated to anything else or the hereditary information were not DNA or RNA at all. That still does not say anything about a supernatural creator, but at least it would contradict the current understanding of evolution.  Of course, in reality there are massive amounts of DNA sequence data that give a very good view of evolution, and the amount is about to get larger by several orders of magnitude with the new sequencing technologies.
What kind of money are you making and what do you plan on using the extra money for?
It's not random, it's a deliberate reference to the well-established low overall quality of YouTube comments.
I can relate more to when you put it in your mouth the wrong way, light up the filter, inhale, and get a lovely lungfull of delicious burning filter :(
got a giant mirror on the wall behind the toilet . so there's no way , otherwise i would have to piss blind and i'm not risking spillage over a slight chance of narcissism .
Yeah, pretty much the cheapest swill I can buy.  Usually pick up a case of Natty, a case of Bud light and a case of Coors for my parties, then a six of something decent for myself.
in addition to the diet I suggest hanging crunches and leg lifts. 
I agree. She is a total cunt :)
Downvoted for "VOTE FOR ME" bullshit fearmongering.
Save water shower with a buddy.
I respect you for a couple of reasons: 1) You're not taking government handouts when you clearly can based on your income bracket though you're young and capable of pulling yourself out of it; 2) You're happy and enjoying yourself; 3) You manage to pay rent while having a deplorable income, that's hardcore.  My questions are as follows:  * How big is your place? Give us square-footage. * Do you have aspirations to start a family? If so, will you bite the bullet and take a job that'll give you the income you'll need to make sure your kid doesn't have it rough? * Have you considered pulling this off in a 3rd world country? Shit, with that kind of discipline you could move to a sovereign Caribbean island (Jamaica, Dominican Republic, Dominica, Grenada, Trinidad, Saint Kitts, etc.), probably have a higher standard of living on the basis that you're white, and do it under a warm sun and a clear blue beach.
I have a lamp in the room corner closest to the direction of sunrise. It has a timer on it so it turns on at about dawn. I still don't wake up for an hour but it makes waking up much more pleasant. I take a piss and then make breakfast. Then I brush my teeth, shower, shave and dress.
I'm pretty sure this is the absolute highest karma-per-word ratio I have ever seen in a comment. Maybe not karma-per-letter, but it's still high even by that measure…
spawn more overlords
VS is good for underwear, but in the bras department they're not as good as Intimacy. They fit you to a size and carry sizes other brands don't, and if they still don't fit perfectly they can have them altered. Granted the bras can cost upwards of $50, but it's worth it to wear the right size. Check them out here: http://www.myintimacy.com/ A properly fitting bra is worth it. Victoria's Secret fitters don't know what they're doing--I've been fit in a bra with a cup size too small and a band size too big, and it was awful. Don't just trust their measuring tapes, get a professional.
Ok, does this mean at the border of Valhalla and Muslim heaven you get all the chicks and unlimited beer?! I WANT
I am = je suis you are (informal) = tu es he/she is = il/elle est we are = nous sommes you are (formal/plural) = vous êtes they are = ils/elles sont  Not so easy now, is it?  There are many irregular verbs in French, many classes of regular verbs and several classes of irregular verbs.
[Much of it](http://www.timesonline.co.uk/tol/news/environment/article6936328.ece), according to the Times Online, a reputable source:   &gt;SCIENTISTS at the University of East Anglia (UEA) have admitted throwing away much of the raw temperature data on which their predictions of global warming are based.  &gt;It means that other academics are not able to check basic calculations said to show a long-term rise in temperature over the past 150 years.   Edit: Apologies. Removed double post.
We worked four ten hour days for years. It was great! Management went back to five day weeks because they had to staff the call center so the lights and A/C had to be on anyway. I would love to go back. Now when I work on my servers during the off hours it has to be early, late, or Saturdays.
i've had this problem, and just wear glasses now.  have you tried a fresh pair of lenses? the proteins can build up on lenses and cause exactly what you are experiencing. the solutions only go so far in removing them.
It's still the Hunter. Theres not much in the game thats as fun as wall jumping around a level, finding a high perch, and landing a 25 damage pounce. I really wish it was still possible to have Hunter teams so me and a buddy could drop a pair of 25 damage pounces on the survivors. 
This wouldn't work unless you have dynamic seating that can add or remove seats as people buy tickets. Otherwise the airline loses money when the under 19 women's table tennis teams take up all the seats.
Well... Were you?
What's the proper answer. I recently learned the average was supposed to be around 10 but that still seems awfully low to me. What do you say to not get into trouble? 
 I'm glad that you posted this! I am not suggesting that it's worthless; I just don't see any particular awesomeness to justify the hype. And this all free hype for Google. I get Lifehacker (love that blog) in my feed and every morning for weeks there has been an item about Wave. I, too, want to know why I should slowly remove my clothes and make sweet, sweet love to this application? 
The "Spocker Shocker"
Look up misdemeanor expungement.  And get crackin.
It's not unreasonable at all. But he wants to spend Christmas morning with his own family because he's said it was his tradition. Grand scheme of life it's not a big deal.  It's not like he's ditching your family events - he's still going to both. If I were you I'd do Christmas Eve together and spent a whole day apart on Christmas. Be with your own families then get together for Boxing day for his grandmothers then back to your fathers on the 27th. A day apart may do you two wonders...  Lastly, you can't complain how you spend *your* time with his family. You choose to. If you want him to visit your family more than you have to visit your family more independent from him. If he wants to see you on a particular weekend you're away, well then he'll just have to visit your family too...
[Psst.](http://ninjawords.com/teat)  ;-)
iDon't know about that one.
wtf, man! that's not a pun!
What do you mean, downtime? I have always had a list of non-priority projects that I work on when I'm not doing a tier-one project or fighting fires. Downtime would mean that you've solved every (development) problem the company has, an unlikely scenario to say the least.  The only thing I can think of is that you're stuck in a job where they don't *trust* you enough to let you tackle everything that needs doing. Which probably means there's something wrong with either you or the company, in which case I recommend either working on your skills or finding a new job (or both) in your downtime.
"we can't stop here, it's bat country" is overused.  My quote is for the enthusiasts as it doesn't appear in the film as I recall.  Also, you suck donkey balls.
Oh yeah, especially China. I find myself drawn to all new stories about that country now that I've spent some time there. I found it difficult to accept the censorship. In America I never had to deal with social networks being blocked and major news stories unreported. Naturally that was difficult to accept. China's place in the world is really interesting right now, but I'm not as bullish about it as much of the Western media seems to report.   The biggest difference in work ethic has to do with urgency. In the States there's this idea that "I'm going to go in to work, bust my ass, and get the hell out of there as soon as I can." It's more relaxed in China and Malaysia, though people still work hard. Instead they'll take time out of the day for lunch, they may show up at 9:30 or 10am, and they may take little breaks during the day. However, it's not uncommon in the offices I've worked in for staff to stay at least 10-12 hours with a workload that may have taken a rushed American 8 hours. It's frustrating when you want to get out of there, but it's certainly nice not to eat lunch at your desk every day. I've heard about ethnic differences among Malaysians in work style, but I haven't seen this yet so I'm not comfortable commenting on it.   Yeah, there have been some crazy racial issues in Malaysia. With guns outlawed, there have been some brutal murders with weapons like hammers and stuff. My understanding of it is it all comes down to the sense of entitlement and available resources. The tension runs three ways between Malays, Chinese, and Indians. However, there are also benefits to the racial diversity just like in the US. The food is incredible and I've seen a lot of embracing of different cultures in small ways. Everybody seems to be multilingual, at least in Kuala Lumpur.   I learned a bit of Mandarin for China, which was essential because none of the cab drivers and hardly any of the service people I encountered in Beijing spoke English. I wanted to learn Malay, but it wasn't necessary because everyone speaks English. Still, I try to pick up words here and there.   Traveled a bit around Northern China and haven't explored Malaysia that much yet. Having an office job keeps me tethered to my desk except for the weekends, so only two-day trips are reasonable.
No not at all, clearly you were fucking other chicks, she lives there and has a right to fuck whomever else she wants. Who cares where it is.   Are you saying its ok for you guys to fuck around on each other, as long as its not in the apartment? Because thats bullshit
**Downvotes like a motherfucker!**
Actually it has atheism is second large nonreligious/religious organization in usa. It just takes small doses to the masses over a long period of time to change people's minds.
Funny how everyone here votes things down in robot lockstep if it's from Fox News or certain British newspapers, but blithely accept items from The Socialist Worker.
From the first comment on Tigers statement on his website:   &gt; Dear Tiger &amp; Family, My thoughts and prayers are with you and your family during this very difficult time. My best wishes over this Christmas season to you and your family. Rember, time will heal all wounds...Please keep the faith... From your loyal fan &amp; friend in Orlando Best regards, John First Sergeant US Army, Retired. 1sgmeyers@gmail.com  What the hell are you praying for?  I can't sympathize or feel sorrow or the need to pray for someone who ran into a fire hydrant at the wee hours of the morning.  Tiger is worth over $600 million and is not worth crying over his problems in the case that he has decided to act irresponsible.
ON THE INTERNET, CAPSLOCK REPRESENT SARCASM, OR MYSPACE
disco ball
Awesome :)
Very good point. That narration can be verified by many independent chains.
This is what Becks fans are reduced to...watching this out of his depth, marginal clown, non-reflective thinker spout his inanities and baseless speculations as if they were from on high.  The prince of modern day idiots.
Seems fake to me.  Lacks the detail a real hedonist would include.  The more I look at it, the less it sounds like a girl.
**Okay. Enough.**  &gt;I feel like I must beg the question though.  Now, I get shit when I get on people for using "beg the question" when they mean "raise the question" and not a circular argument, but: *I am now vindicated.* Certainly this is a rotten, wretched use for the phrase.  Who's with me?
Tacky.
I could avoid 100 mushrooms
The vile Americans are supporting this election. War on terror! 
here, i'll get you off to a good start.  happy birthday!
Which is exactly why he is so unique. Being in the military, his opinion might be the rare exception. More often is the tendency to blindly agree with the sentiment that the military is upholding our freedoms, without even inquiring as to whether or not that sentiment means anything, or is based on fact. Thus, being able to second guess such platitudes and be inquisitive means being able to think for one's self.
Probably some regressions compared to stable. IIRC they decided on a stable version number and branch for wine after ~10 years because things like Office were working (if not well). EDIT: http://appdb.winehq.org/objectManager.php?sClass=version&amp;iId=2736
Is that actually a published paper? It certainly doesn't seem to pay any regard to any space restrictions or layout conventions, which I assume that most journals would require! 
I love you.
I don't have anything specific in mind at the moment, but I do most of my development work in C++ at the moment.  If I were to use a cloud based IDE, it would need C++ support.  Plus, it's always a good thing to broaden your audience (especially when it comes to an IDE).
Why haven't I heard of this, I love clive owen!  
Right, so you *should* wait for someone you love, but not all the way until marriage.  
No, they only do it with superusers.
Battlefield 1942. I'm in a plane, the enemy has lost all their bases.  Suddenly a base is captured.  I'm flying around, waiting for enemies to spawn, and I drop a bomb at the newly captured base just for something to do.  As the bomb touches down at the flagpole, 8 guys spawn and instantly die. Of course, they accused me of cheating.
A cheeseburger would be that to a narwhal.
If I decided I felt uncomfortable with my roommate eating oatmeal for breakfast, would I then have a right to violate his privacy and shout insults at him if I discovered him secretly eating oatmeal while claiming it was cereal? He's uncomfortable with something that she has every right to do. The new guy may have a living situation that makes it impossible to hook up over at his place instead. Maybe he still lives with his parents (who, unlike jealous exes, *do* have a right to unilaterally set household rules).
So you're saying this is similar to all the gays who voted for him believing that he was running on a platform of allowing gay marriage, only to find that in the vice presidental debates they actually mentioned he would not be supporting it?    I am just pointing out that a lot of the people voting for him had no idea what they were doing. What I want to know is what happened to Obama's PROMISE review and OVERTURN any and all unconstitutional executive orders passed by Bush?  Coming from a constitutional lawyer I thought he was going to make good on this one!   He hasn't even mentioned it!
Like losing an old friend.  Don't worry, you can always pick up where you left off.
Same here. I was thinking of buying the THQpack, but decided to check the retail value of the games I wanted (all CoH, all DoW). Steam lists the price of the full CoH pack as €65, on play.com it costs £7.99. Thats over 8 times as much. The Steam price for DoW2 is €39.99, on play it costs £7.99. Because of the whole €=$ thing and overall too high prices, a sale on steam just means it is closer to retail, but not close enough.
[Here](http://thanatos.net/galleries/categories.php?cat_id=7&amp;sessionid=73b4bac3ae81435614a4ac3296e8cb23&amp;page=1) is a collection of legitimate Victorian death portraiture. Notice that while they take photos of the dead, they aren't propped up or made to look anything other than dead. They're in bed, or in a coffin, or being cradled by parents. Nothing as bizarre as faking being alive.
It's funny how many of you liberal dipshits are ok with the troop increases because Obama is President. He could suspend the Constitution tomorrow and you pathetic worshippers would find a way to justify and praise it.  For those hopeless morons who oppose the increase in troops... Obama mulled this decision over for months... And still decided that it was in America's best interests. Right or wrong, he is better informed than you pathetic dopes who read HuffPo. If he still made the decision to greenlight this, what does that tell you?   And by the way loony lefties, the Bush surge worked, even after your leadership declared Iraq lost.  Fucking pathetic immature liberal idiots, but I repeat myself.
I guess that explains all the viruses too.
Also, Hotel California.
You don't get it. CO2 cannot cause very much direct warming. Climatologists actually argue that our climate is not "buffering" CO2's effect, but multiplying it. This is why the need for complex models to justify the claim. The pure chemistry shows that CO2 can only directly account for maybe 0.1C of warming. 
He has a cleaning business. He answered that [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/a9m3j/i_have_made_less_than_15k_per_year_for_the_past_3/c0ghtz2)  Please read, so that we don't fill up with duplicate questions.
Yes yes yes.  Bit it just drives me to download all my TV from torrent sites all advert free and weeks, months and sometimes years ahead of the local stations - so fuck 'em.  Over time as more and more people do that they'll lose more and more advertising dollars to Google and then they'll go bust like the newspapers.  Good riddance.
This just in:  People who don't mass-produce car engines have a great idea for mass-produced car engine.
Janitors are a unique profession in the world because they are paid to clean and take care of buildings.
Glad to see it already mentioned.
Be happy the kid is using his head (no pun intended). Don't make him feel like you are counting the condoms or he will quit using them.
You are so going to love bacon!  I'm so happy for what you are about to experience!
He has a cleaning business. He answered that [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/a9m3j/i_have_made_less_than_15k_per_year_for_the_past_3/c0ghtz2)  Please read, so that we don't fill up with duplicate questions.
I was introduced to my husband by my friend who happened to be my husband's cousin.  I met my friend at a convention in Philadelphia, PA, even though we had friends in common in our respective home towns. I had just accepted a teaching job in Texarkana and my friends were taking me to a going away dinner at an Irish pub in Tulsa, OK.  My friend was driving down from Kansas City, MO, and asked if he bring his cousin along.  It was his cousin's 34th birthday and he was going through a divorce and needed some cheering up.  I said sure and they drove down to Fayetteville, AR.  When we were all gathering for the drive to the pub, I gave my friend a hug, looked over his shoulder and saw my (future) husband.  I promptly turned around, put my hands on my hips, looked him up and down, then said, "You're kinda cute."  At that exact moment, I knew I was going to marry him.  Seriously.  I had never intended on getting married, either, until I met my husband.   We've been together almost 5.5 years now.  =)
Steroids.  Oh wait, you meant in the game.
Q-tips? The only use for them I've found is cleaning metal inside electronics.
She may be a Gryffindor, but I'll make her hufflepuff.
No of course not. He sucks now. That's why he's been relegated to the undercard.   On the other hand, Diaz, Maynard, Dunham, Escudero, Lawlor, MacDonald, Story and a bunch of the other guys are all either pretty young and/or fresh, and have great potential.  There's a lot to get excited about on this card.
If I give you a dollar through paypal will you show us your boobies? Pweeese?
This implies that looking up traditional religions is just fine. I guess it's true, nobody fucks with the Jesus.
*epic* film.  P-51 MUSTAAAAAAANNGGG!!!!
Are you from michigan? I knew a kid that got paintballed in the eye and had a goofy pupil because of it.
Now now, don't hate on the Flare Gun. It's a genuinely decent weapon, especially for igniting un-medic'd heavies from long range. Backburner is also a good weapon but nobody ever uses it correctly.
I'm repeating myself because I'm literally getting zero response to what I'm directly talking about.  Plus, most don't check back unless you specifically respond to them.  What you're saying is a completely different issue than what anyone's brought up.  You've turned it into an us-vs-them issue, which isn't responding to what I've directly said either, but as to what you've said; I *really* dislike this.  Truly.  Do you honestly believe this?  &gt;We are saying, fucking look... socialists lie. Like we always said. They can't help it. They know they can't sell you socialism through reason, so they make stuff up to pretend it's science. If they though religion was the key to you, they'd be saying God expects us to take care of the planet. But they don't, so they're saying 'science' instead of God. Don't trust these people. And consider our philosophy. We don't ask for your blood.  &gt;We seek to disarm the trap that socialists are setting for rational people.  &gt;We are showing that no word out of the mouth of a socialist isn't tainted.  This directly implies that you think that libertarians are inherently rational and socialists inherently irrational/incorrect?  You honestly think the other side is *empirically* wrong, and that your side is empirically right?  Not only is that position incredibly haughty, it is incredibly foolish.  It boils down a complex issue into an absurd black and white one which you declare sides upon.  It's horribly extremist, very exclusive and elitist, and just a horribly self-aggrandizing attitude. I can't say enough bad and condemning things about what you just said, but it's just about the worst way someone can treat an issue which is clearly shades of grey and arguable.  It's the guise of rational discussion with the true intent of patriotism toward the cause.  It's dangerous and I dislike it intensely.  If you honestly think "they are all categorically stupid, we are all smart", and *that* is the issue, I really don't know what to say to you.  That's not a *real* position, that's the highest form of condescension, and I wash my hands of it.  You are the first person I've downvoted on this thread, because I think this type of thing honestly *detracts* from the conversation, and I want it hidden.  And I'm not even "socialist".  But if it's "us vs them", I'm definitely not with you, so I guess I would be in your book.  &gt;When we stop that, we win.  When you realize it's not about "winning", I'll talk to you.
I'll let you know, I don't socialize much, so I've never expirenced any conversation like you've illustrated.  But I'd like to thank you for making me feel like I'm not missing out on anything.  
Except not nearly as cool.
Fucking wrong.
Please keep a poop journal. I want to read about your bouts of poop-induced creativity. 
Though, it's debatable if programming language convention is the best way to describe things to the world, since most people != programmers.  And all people !== programmers.
Stampy.
My eyes would roll, but they've been burned out by the CP-posing-as-animooted-gif threads.
This is my new favourite subreddit :D
Cats transcend gender differences . 
and here come all the asians and anime fans to defend their faire maidens.  sorry that i have a different opinion on what is attractive than you do.  
&gt; What's the worse that can happen?  PEPPER SPRAY
5th Annual Youth Film Festival  Film Categories:  Narrative, Documentary, Music and Green Theme Age Categories:  10-13 &amp; 14-18 Running Time:  Under 11 minutes  Start working on your concept now! Invite friends and family to see your film on the big screen!  Submit your film by March 3, 2010 Festival Date: April 25, 2010  Download or Pick up entry form at the Lark Theater www.larktheater.net  For more information call Lark Theater, 924-5111.  Sponsored by City of Larkspur &amp; Wells Fargo Foundation
A special network for the people who think the Iraq War was a mistake, finally!
There's a reason why the leading metal commentary site is anus.com.
I don't understand why people drink to the point of blacking out consistently. If you know you black out after two drinks and the next day don't remember what happened, why not avoid drinking that much the next time?  I understand it may be difficult to remember how much you drank to get that way but wouldn't it be beneficial to find out before you do it again? How is it OK for someone to have an experience and then completely black it out?  What's the point of the experience then?  Why deal with the consequences of drinking and a night out without being able to experience the actual fun of the evening before? tl;dr: Why are people ok with blacking out over and over again?
I prefer Verdana.
your mom's driveway
But what about meat grown from cow, chicken or lamb cells?
Exactly. He's clearly abiding by a double standard.
Again, 17 is the age of consent in most U.S. states.  It's most certainly not pedophilia as that involve pre-pubescent children.  It's completely common for older men (men older than 17) to appreciate women who are younger than them -- Olsen twins, Emma Watson, Lindsay Lohan, Brittany Spears... do I need to go on? It would be weird if the much older guys were actually hitting on these younger woman, but they're not. Same goes for the older women and the younger men in these movies.  How exactly is it "wrong on the most basic level?"  Unless you can't distinguish reality from fantasy there's nothing even remotely wrong here.
my babelfish translated that into 'drink till you pass out.'
By continuing to reply to this thread, you are not only also not abiding by "Godwin's Law" but also, equally at fault, if not more so. Moreover you used Godwin's Law [as a formal proof/philosophical argument.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Q.E.D.) You can't then step back and say "hey man its not my law... i'm just here arbitrarily enforcing it because that's what passes as wit back where I'm from."  Regardless, having copied that from wikipedia, I'm surprised you didn't continue on to read the **next two sentences**:   &gt;It is considered poor form to raise such a comparison arbitrarily with the motive of ending the thread. There is a widely recognized codicil that any such ulterior-motive invocation of Godwin's law will be unsuccessful (this is sometimes referred to as "Quirk's Exception").[6]
great for shining antiques, as well
meh, I think you have to consider that in a certain frame of reference...  ...for eons humans of either gender didn't live very long at all, so mating young was something of a necessity to propagate the species (as well as a method of tribal negotiation, etc.).  Until well into the 20th century most families depended on agrarian means and breeding a large family to help provide was key.  Obviously people would start families "early and often".  Another point to consider is this - age 12, in recent centuries at least, was pretty damned early to be married off in most civilizations.  Certainly not unheard of, and perhaps common in *SOME* societies, but within the last few centuries mostly uncommon.  Mid teens might be more accurate for the last few hundred years for *most* societies.  And while that's still a child in most peoples' view, there's a HUGE difference between 12 and 16 physically.  Again, I'm speaking from a post 1900 perspective, but I do see the point you're making.  (I just think it isn't quite as cut and dried as it sounds.)
I think the [UK](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/8375567.stm) went there before Denmark.
Have you tried [gmane](http://gmane.org/)? I'm not entirely sure of the details of what you would have to do to get listed, but it seems like this would be a decent alternative. I don't regularly use gmane but I often see them linked to from reddit so I figure somebody is using it.
Well having the facts online makes it harder to lie about it.
very kind people with very small penis
Being a diabetic he's going to need some carbs in there too. I'm also not sure how well bacon will last the next 10 years?  Spam and rice can't be all that bad can it? &gt;_&lt; 
He is also sexier than Edward or so I've heard.  How does he look in the sun?
I'm with you on this. I love kids...don't want any of my own. And I've been burned one too many times to consider legally binding myself to another person.
I much prefer the charger. I don't like cables. My Elphs have had a completely cable-free solution. Just drop the battery out the bottom and drop it in the charger. It also means I can have extra batteries that charge while I'm using the camera, which I used to do all the time with my long shoots. Cables to a camera often damage them over time due to strain, and repeated mechanical connects and disconnects. I have a video camera I can't get working because cable connections are too loose now. I haven't had any batteries not make proper contact after years.
**ENERGY! SCIENCE! ENERGY! SCIENCE! ENERGY! SCIENCE!**
Did the results let you down?
never thought of it that way, great pictures :D
She looks all woman to me. Plus, I'm digging the black suit and black nail polish ... very hot.
"Holding up a sign that wishes harm upon them for that is certainly hateful." Don't Christians want sinners to conform to Christian beliefs as an alternative to burning in hell? In my book, giving someone the choice between eternal torment or denying their true self is wishing them harm.
I always see obese black people there.  In a town with a handful of black people you can walk into a golden corral and see a sea of black.  They will drive miles to go to it.  It's like the mall of america to them.
I believe the entirety of my argument was that islamic culture continues to practice slavery and that you are an ass for ignoring that fact.  You are more than welcome to examine cultures in which slavery continues to be practiced, but to simply play the 'it's not unique because other cultures HAVE (past tense) practiced slavery' card ignores that the subject in question CONTINUES this practice, now, today.  In some circumstances openly and without question, in others it is merely an 'Open Secret'. The malevolent symptom is that unlike koine greek or latin, only arabic remains a living language, probably generating dozens of new words for enslaved human beings as we speak.  Some of them will live on.  It's not bigotry to point out that unlike other cultures, this one is still wholly engaged in a practice modern, civilized human beings find detestable.
I used to let my little cousin wreak havoc on my dear cities in simcity 2000... making sure he never hit "save" of course.
&gt; It is science. Peter S. Curtis, an ecologist at Ohio State University co-authored a paper in the botanical journal New Phytologist in 2002.  True, he did. It's got nothing to do with that graph though.  Curtis' report does indeed suggest that crop yields increase at higher CO2 concentrations, but that this is cancelled out by a corresponding decrease in nutritional quality.  Again, the guy in the video is a quack and a fraud. His use of that graph **is not science**.  &gt; And you conveniently ignored my crucial point  I didn't answer it because you were responding to a point I never made. I'm not willing to sacrifice human well-being for polar bears. But I think that it's not an either/or situation - we shouldn't have to sacrifice either. I also believe that there's probably nothing we can do to save polar bears if arctic ice continues to decrease as it's forecast to do.
A little known fact: this incident is where we get the word, sandwitch. Or was it sammich?
Did you even read the whole thing you linked?  It says right in the article  &gt; This method is not frequently used today.   Instead they use either a chemical test (or a formula based on one) that accounts for things like undigested fibers.
The best interest is to not erradicate all other life, and polluting to the point where our own existence is a misery of wallowing in toxic sludge. You know, sustainability.
I wonder whether he has a PS3 or XBox (or PC).
WTF are you telling me that for? If you read the above, I suggested that people that throw rocks and Molotov cocktails should be arrested.  You're setting up a straw man argument to defend the indefensible: The arrest of people *before* they committed a crime.
